California, session 20252026, SB112.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Item 5227-118-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022 is amended to read: 5227-118-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funding appropriated in this item shall be available for competitive grants for district attorneys for the Organized Retail Theft Vertical Prosecution Grant Program for the purpose of addressing increased levels of retail theft property crimes by using a vertical prosecution model. 2. In awarding the funds, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall, at minimum, require the grantee to demonstrate the following requirements on its application for the competitive grant: (a) How the additional funds will meaningfully address the increase in organized retail theft in the jurisdiction and the existing hurdles of implementing a vertical prosecution model in their jurisdiction to prosecute these crimes without this grant. (b) How the funding will be used in facilitating collaboration with online marketplaces and retailers to address the increase in property crimes in the jurisdiction. (c) How the jurisdiction plans to use alternatives to incarceration, including diversion or restorative justice programs, to reduce organized retail theft and help reduce recidivism. (d) How the jurisdiction will be able to sustain this program upon the expiration of this one-time grant funding. 3. The county receiving the competitive grant shall do the following: (a) Employ a vertical prosecution methodology for organized retail theft crimes. (b) Dedicate at least one deputy district attorney and one district attorney investigator whose primary role is the investigation and prosecution of organized retail theft crimes. (c) Provide the Board of State and Community Corrections with annual data on the number of organized retail theft cases filed by that county, the number of organized retail theft convictions obtained, and the sentences imposed for those convicted of organized retail theft in that county. The county shall also provide the number of instances where vertical prosecution was used to obtain those convictions and the sentences imposed. The county shall also provide the number of theft-related property crimes that were charged overall in the jurisdiction that did not use the vertical prosecution model and the resulting number of convictions. 4. On or before January 1, 2027, September 1, 2028, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall submit to the Legislature and the Governor a report relating to the information provided in subdivision (c) of Provision 3, and how the funding was used, and a description of the outcomes of the grant. 5. Funding received by district attorney offices pursuant to this program shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, existing financial resources. 6. Of the amount identified in Schedule (1), up to 5 percent shall be available to the Board of State and Community Corrections for transfer to Schedule (1) of Item 5227-001-0001 for costs to administer the grant program. Funds transferred pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. SEC. 2. Item 6100-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022 is amended to read: 6100-001-0001—For support of State Department of Education ........................ 117,478,000 Schedule: (1) 5205010-Curriculum Services ........................ 86,107,000 (1.5) 5210048-After School Programs ........................ 1,717,000 (2) 5210066-Special Program Support ........................ 41,606,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 60,017,000 (4) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −60,017,000 (5) Reimbursements to 5205010-Curriculum Services ........................ −8,621,000 (6) Reimbursements to 5210066-Special Program Support ........................ −3,331,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 33190 of the Education Code or any other law, the State Department of Education shall not expend funds to prepare a statewide summary of pupil performance on school district proficiency assessments or a compilation of information on private schools with five or fewer pupils. 2. Funds appropriated in this item may be expended or encumbered to make one or more payments under a personal services contract of a visiting educator pursuant to Section 19050.8 of the Government Code, a long-term special consultant services contract, or an employment contract between an entity that is not a state agency and a person who is under the direct or daily supervision of a state agency, only if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The person providing service under the contract provides full financial disclosure to the Fair Political Practices Commission in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission. (b) The service provided under the contract does not result in the displacement of any represented civil service employee. (c) The rate of compensation for salary and health benefits for the person providing service under the contract does not exceed by more than 10 percent the current rate of compensation for salary and health benefits determined by the Department of Human Resources for civil service personnel in a comparable position. The payment of any other compensation or any reimbursement for travel or per diem expenses shall be in accordance with the State Administrative Manual and the rules and regulations of the California Victim Compensation Board. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be expended for the development or dissemination of program advisories, including, but not limited to, program advisories on the subject areas of reading, writing, and mathematics, unless explicitly authorized by the State Board of Education. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $206,000 shall be available as matching funds for the Department of Rehabilitation to provide coordinated services to disabled pupils. 5. By October 31 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance a file of all charter school average daily attendance (ADA) and state and local revenue associated with charter school general purpose entitlements as part of the P2 Local Control Funding Formula File. By March 1 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance a file of all charter school ADA and state and local revenue associated with charter school general purpose entitlements as part of the P1 Local Control Funding Formula File. It is the expectation that such reports will be provided annually. 6. On or before April 15 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance an electronic file that includes complete district- and county-level state appropriations limit information reported to the State Department of Education. The State Department of Education shall make every effort to ensure that all districts have submitted the necessary information requested on the relevant reporting forms. 7. The State Department of Education shall make information available to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the budget committees of each house of the Legislature by October 31, March 31, and May 31 of each year regarding the amount of Proposition 98 savings estimated to be available for reversion by June 30 of that year. 8. Reimbursement expenditures pursuant to this item resulting from the imposition by the State Department of Education of a commercial copyright fee shall not be expended sooner than 30 days after the State Department of Education submits to the Department of Finance a legal opinion affirming the authority to impose such fees and the arguments supporting that position against any objections or legal challenges to the fee filed with the State Department of Education. Any funds received pursuant to imposition of a commercial copyright fee may only be expended as necessary for outside counsel contingent on a certification of the Superintendent of Public Instruction that sufficient expertise is not available within departmental legal staff. The State Department of Education shall not expend greater than $300,000 for such purposes without first notifying the Department of Finance of the necessity therefor, and upon receiving approval in writing. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $1,011,000 is available for dispute resolution services, including mediation and fair hearing services, provided through contract for special education programs. 10. Of the reimbursement funds appropriated in this item, at least $612,000 is provided to the State Department of Education for the oversight of State Board of Education-authorized charter schools. The Department of Finance may administratively establish up to 2.0 positions for this purpose as workload materializes. 11. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $109,000 shall be for 1.0 position within the State Department of Education to support activities associated with the Clean Energy Job Creation Fund. 12. Of the amount appropriated in this item, at least $852,000 and 6.0 positions are provided to support the Local Control Funding Formula administration pursuant to Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2013. These funds and positions shall be used by the State Department of Education to support the apportionment of, and fiscal oversight of, funding pursuant to the Local Control Funding Formula. 13. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $115,000 and 1.0 position shall be available for the State Department of Education to support activities associated with charter school appeals as required under subdivision (k) of Section 47605 of the Education Code. 14. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $1,140,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of the Local Control Funding Formula accountability system pursuant to Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2013. 15. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $120,000 and 1.0 permanent position is provided to support implementation of the Local Control Funding Formula, such as providing unduplicated pupil counts, matching foster data received from the State Department of Social Services, and meeting foster youth reporting requirements. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $271,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to continue the development and maintenance of the state and federal accountability systems. 17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $129,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position for workload associated with school district reorganizations. 18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $108,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position to assist local educational agencies applying for a universal meal service program, pursuant to Chapter 724 of the Statutes of 2017. 19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $128,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position to complete additional education equity compliance reviews, pursuant to Chapter 493 of the Statutes of 2017. 20. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $252,000 shall be used to support the development and maintenance of a computer-based English Language Proficiency Assessment for California (ELPAC) and a computer-based alternative ELPAC for students with disabilities. 21. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $257,000 is provided to support 2.0 existing positions for the coordination of a centralized Uniform Complaint Procedures process and database to improve the administration and resolution of Uniform Complaint Procedures complaints and appeals received by the State Department of Education; to standardize Uniform Complaint Procedures policies, procedures, and templates departmentwide; and to provide a report by January 31 of each year with a summary of the number of days for completion of appeals by complaint type and program area, including the rationale for complaints that exceeded 60 days. 22. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $117,000 is to support activities associated with data collection and reporting required under the Districts of Choice program. 23. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $600,000 is provided to support 2.0 existing positions and workload related to school-based comprehensive sexual health education. 24. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $105,000 and 1.0 position are to support increases in emergency average daily attendance waiver requests. 25. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $452,000 is provided for 3.0 positions to support compliance workload within the State Department of Education’s Special Education Division. 26. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $275,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program and the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program. Availability of these funds is contingent upon the State Department of Education fully supporting no fewer than 6.0 full-time regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education in the Agricultural Education Unit of the Career and College Transition Division using federal Perkins V Act funding. If the State Department of Education is unable to support at least 6.0 full-time regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education with federal Perkins V Act funding, $142,000 and 1.0 position provided in this item to support the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program and the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program shall be redirected for that purpose. As a condition of receiving this funding, the State Department of Education shall make information available to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the budget committees of each house of the Legislature by October 31 of each fiscal year regarding the split of the federal Perkins V Act funding between the State Department of Education and the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges. This information shall include, but is not limited to, the maximum set-asides allowable for state administration and state leadership activities, the minimum amount required for local program distribution, as well as a breakdown of how the State Department of Education is utilizing the funds in each category. 27. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $303,000 is provided to support 2.0 positions for the joint interagency resolution team and foster youth coordinated services pursuant to Chapter 815 of the Statutes of 2018. 28. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $77,000 is provided to support 0.5 existing position to update existing, and develop new, resources and strategies, and in-service teacher training to support lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, and questioning students, pursuant to Chapter 775 of the Statutes of 2019. 29. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $77,000 is provided to support 1.0 position to provide appropriate language access in American Sign Language. 30. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $696,000 and 3.0 positions are available for the department to collect data to track the implementation of the changes for charter school petitions and renewals, pursuant to Chapter 486 of the Statutes of 2019. 31. Of the amount provided in this item, $192,000 reimbursements is provided on an ongoing basis to support the administration of the California High School Proficiency Examination. 32. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $264,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to establish a state education disaster team to support activities related to disaster planning, preparedness, and response for schools as part of California’s Disaster Preparedness, Response, and Recovery efforts. 33. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $336,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support new ongoing workload for the School Fiscal Services Division related to deferrals and average daily attendance changes pursuant to Chapter 24 of the Statutes of 2020. 34. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $136,000 and 1.0 position is provided to support workload related to creating a school emergency reporting system. 35. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $12,598,000 is provided to support 52.8 existing positions in the Nutrition Services Division, and 30.0 positions in the Early Education Division to support remaining early learning workload after the transition of child care programs to the State Department of Social Services. 36. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $376,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support increased workload in the Accounting Office. 37. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,200,000 is provided on a one-time basis for litigation costs related to the COVID-19 pandemic. These funds are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2024. 38. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $3,403,000 is provided to support existing authorized administrative positions. 39. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,960,000 is provided to support existing authorized administrative positions. 40. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $700,000 is provided to support 5.0 new positions and 1.0 existing position for the State Department of Education to establish the Office of School-Based Health. 41. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $250,000 and 1.0 permanent position are provided to establish the California Computer Science Coordinator. The coordinator shall provide statewide coordination in implementing the computer science content standards developed pursuant to Section 60605.4 of the Education Code and lead the implementation of the computer science strategic implementation plan adopted by the State Board of Education. The State Department of Education shall provide a status update on the recruitment and hiring of the coordinator to the Department of Finance by March 15, 2022. 42. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $530,000 and 3.5 positions are available in the 2021–22 fiscal year, $538,000 and 3.5 positions are available in the 2022–23 and 2023–24 fiscal years, and $425,000 and 2.5 positions are available thereafter to support workload associated with expanded Transitional Kindergarten programs. 43. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $437,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support early learning workload in the Child Development and Nutrition Fiscal Services Division. 44. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,670,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support early learning workload in the Early Education Division. 45. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,583,000 and 11.7 positions are provided to support early learning workload. 46. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $143,000 and 1.0 position are available for a Medi-Cal billing coordinator to serve as a liaison with the State Department of Health Care Services, stakeholders, and others with respect to Medi-Cal billing options, the school-based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities Program, and medically necessary federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment Benefits. 47. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $467,000 and 4.0 positions are provided for the School Fiscal Services Division to support workload related to state apportionment calculations, review of average daily attendance waivers, technical assistance, and implementation of grant programs. 48. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,900,000 is available in the 2022–23 and 2023–24 fiscal years for, and 29.5 permanent positions are provided for, workload related to implementing a universal school meals program. 49. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,653,000 and 14.0 positions are provided for the Expanded Learning Division to provide students in classroom-based instructional programs with access to comprehensive after school and intersessional expanded learning opportunities. 50. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $130,000 and 1.0 position is provided to support implementation of the Standardized Account Code Structure web-based application. 51. Of the amount appropriated in this item, at least $286,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support professional development programs, including, but not limited to, the National Board Certification Incentive Grant, the Educator Effectiveness Block Grant, Professional Development on Social Emotional Learning and Trauma Informed Practices, Professional Development for Reading Instruction and Intervention, Training for Youth Mental and Behavioral Health, and other teacher professional development. 52. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $286,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of the universal school meals program. 53. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $561,000 and 4.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for work related to the Expanded Learning and Transitional Kindergarten Programs. 54. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $425,000 and 3.0 positions are provided for additional new formula-driven program implementation. 55. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $155,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the Technology Services Division for Transitional Kindergarten average daily attendance data collection. 56. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $742,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to support the Community Schools Partnership Grant Program and $350,000 is provided on a one-time basis for a technical assistance contract to support initial grant recipients. 57. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $143,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the California Healthy Kids Survey and social-emotional learning professional development. 58. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $143,000 and 1.0 position are provided for the Early Education Division to address increased workload in the California State Preschool Program. 59. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $130,000 and 1.0 position are provided for the Fiscal and Administrative Services Division to address increased workload in the California State Preschool Program. 61. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $201,000 is provided for 2.0 positions in the Office of School Transportation. 62. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the Supporting Inclusive Practices Grant. 63. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $690,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to improve transitions from Part C Early Intervention Services to Part B Special Education Services. 64. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,166,000 and 2.0 positions are available in the 2022–23 fiscal year, and $266,000 and 2.0 positions are available thereafter, to support increased departmental information technology needs and workload. 65. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,251,000 and 6.0 positions are available in the 2022–23 fiscal year, and $1,022,000 and 6.0 positions are available thereafter to support departmental information security infrastructure. 66. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided through fiscal year 2024–25 to support implementation of the Dual Language Immersion Grant Program. 67. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,702,000 and 9.0 positions are provided to support implementation and ongoing workload for the Cradle-to-Career Data System. 69. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $383,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to the Budget Management Office to effectively support new and expanded programs and address increased workload due to Fi$Cal implementation. 70. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,500,000 is provided on a one-time basis to support annual formative assessments for the California Community Schools Partnership Program. This funding shall be made available through fiscal year 2027–28. 2031–32. 71. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $159,000 and 1.0 positions are provided to coordinate improved access to early intervention services for children prior to entering kindergarten. 72. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $458,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of Chapter 498, Statutes of 2021 (AB 1363). 73. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $633,000 and 4.0 positions are provided for the programmatic monitoring of the California State Preschool Program. 74. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $119,000 and 1.0 position are appropriated for the fiscal monitoring of the California State Preschool Program. 75. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $436,000 and 2.5 positions are provided to support the implementation of Universal Transitional Kindergarten. 76. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $90,000 and 0.5 position is provided to support fiscal compliance monitoring reviews of program funds. 77. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $122,000 and 1.0 position is provided to support fund reconciliation workload. 78 Of the funds appropriated in this item, 1.0 position and $213,000 one-time funds are provided to support an increase in legal workload related to new and expanded programs including Universal Transitional Kindergarten and the California State Preschool Program. 79. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $167,000 is provided for Zoom licenses to host webinars and online meetings. 80. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $500,000 is provided on a one-time basis for legal costs associated with the Kerri K., et al. v. State of California settlement. 81. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $350,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support increased workload related to operating the information technology systems used by the State Department of Education’s early education programs. 82. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $276,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to incorporate early identification for learning disabilities into the State Department of Education’s preschool assessment tools, and to provide training for educators on effective use of those tools. 83. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,028,000 and 7.0 positions are provided in the 2022–23 and 2023–24 fiscal years, decreasing to $612,000 and 4.0 positions in the 2024–5 fiscal year and ongoing. The positions will support increased workload related to administering the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program. 84. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $891,000 and 6.0 positions in the 2022–23 and 2023–24 fiscal years, decreasing to $769,000 and 5.0 positions in the 2024–25 fiscal year and ongoing. These positions will support increased workload related to revising California State Preschool Program policies. 85. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $356,000 and 2.5 positions are provided to support workload associated with expanded Transitional Kindergarten programs. 87. Of the amount provided in this item, $75,000 reimbursements is provided through the 2026–27 fiscal year for state operations support of Fresno Unified School District in facilitation of grant funds from the Wallace Foundation. 88. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the development and expansion of California Science Test (CAST) and the California Alternate Assessment (CAA) for Science within the Assessment Development and Administration Division. 89. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the development and expansion of English Language Proficiency Assessments for California (ELPAC) and the California Spanish Assessment (CSA) within the Assessment Development and Administration Division. 90. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $140,000 is provided through June 30, 2027, to provide technical assistance and support to local educational agencies in hiring and training literacy coaches and reading specialists through the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program, pursuant to pending legislation. 91. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $200,000 is provided to support the completion of an interim report and a final comprehensive report on the impact of the literacy coaches and reading specialists hired and trained through the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program, pursuant to pending legislation. Funding shall be available for expenditure or encumbrance until December 31, 2029. 92. Of the amount provided in this item, $500,000 reimbursements is provided annually through the 2024–25 fiscal year to accommodate increased collection of nonpublic school certification fees. 93. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,069,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for workload related to the Local Control Funding Formula declining enrollment protection proposal, AB 602 Special Education formula changes, and other fiscal-related workload for new programs. 94. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $250,000 is available to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for fiscal oversight of county offices of education and the seven school districts in the state that share the same governing board as their county office of education for the services of a fiscal expert or advisor pursuant to Education Code Section 1630. The State Department of Education shall notify and receive approval from the Director of Finance in advance of retaining the services of a fiscal expert or fiscal advisor. 95. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $150,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the School Health and Safety Office to support LGBTQ+ initiatives and best practices. 96. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $636,000 is available to support the Preschool Development Grant renewal. SEC. 3. Section 19.56 of the Budget Act of 2022 is amended to read: SEC. 19.56. (a) (1) The amounts appropriated pursuant to this section reflect legislative priorities. (2) For allocations in this section that include a designated state entity, the entity shall allocate the funds to the recipients identified in the paragraphs following each designation. The state entity shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this section. Self-attestation by the receiving entity is an acceptable method of verification of the use of funds, if determined appropriate by the state entity. (3) Notwithstanding any other law, allocations pursuant to this section are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code. (4) If an item number for the appropriate department for a state entity does not exist, and such an item number is required in order to make the specified allocations, the Department of Finance may create an item number for this purpose. (5) Notwithstanding any other law, a designated state entity administering an allocation pursuant to this section may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment, and the allocation may be used to pay for costs incurred prior to the effective date of the act adding this paragraph. (6) The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of allocating authority to a different state entity to facilitate the expenditure of the funds for the intended legislative purpose. Any state entity that allocates funds may also, in consultation with the Department of Finance, use an alternative local fiscal agent that is not identified in this section instead of the fiscal agent designated in this section if necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. Any change to the allocating state entity or fiscal agent made pursuant to this paragraph shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing at least 30 days, or no sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine, prior to the change. It is the intent of the Legislature to revise this section during the 2022-23 fiscal year to reflect any changes necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. (7) Unless otherwise specified in this section, funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2024, and expenditure until June 30, 2026. (8) Funding provided in this section shall not be used for a purpose subject to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. If the Department of Finance determines that any allocation would be considered an appropriation for that purpose, the funding shall not be allocated, and the department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of that finding. (9) The amounts specified in subdivisions (b) to (m), inclusive, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund as follows: (b) PARKS AND OPEN SPACE (1) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $5,000,000 to the Department of Parks and Recreation for the Martial Cottle Park Improvements. (B) $5,000,000 to the Department of Parks and Recreation for the California Citrus State Historic Park improvements. (C) $1,000,000 to the City of Bakersfield for the Community Action Partnership of Kern for the Friendship House Community Center Sports Field Repairs. (D) $25,000,000 for the California Citrus State Historic Park Capital improvements. (E) $15,000,000 to the City of Anaheim for the repair and expansion of Boysen Park. (F) $2,500,000 to the City of Glendale for the Mountain Oaks Open Space Acquisition. (G) $2,500,000 to the City of Suisun for Park Upgrades: Prosperity Garden Park and Montebello Vista Park. (H) $1,500,000 to the City of Fairfield for Park Upgrades: Linear Park and Allan Witt Park. (I) $1,300,000 to the City of Twentynine Palms for the rehabbing and complete reconstruction of its community pool. (J) $1,000,000 to the County of Sonoma for the Maxwell Farms Regional Park. (K) $200,000 to the City of South El Monte for the Renovation of New Temple Park facilities. (L) $500,000 to the City of La Mesa for the School and Park Mobility Access improvements. (M) $500,000 to the City of Whittier for the Lighting Installation for the Murphy Ranch Little League. (N) $200,000 to the City of San Gabriel for the La Laguna de San Gabriel Historic Playground (Vincent Lugo Park Restoration). (O) $100,000 to the City of Modesto for the Boys & Girls Clubs of Stanislaus County for the modular unit at Martin Luther King Jr. Park to be moved to a new location adjacent to the Dryden Golf Course: funding for Phase 2. (P) $1,600,000 to the City of Vista for the Luz Duran Park community center and Sheriff’s substation. (Q) $1,500,000 to the City of Encinitas for the Moonlight Beach barrels and storm water repairs. (R) $1,400,000 to the City of Vista for EV charging station. (S) $700,000 to the City of Encinitas for the Cardiff Sport Park LED sports lighting. (T) $600,000 to the City of Encinitas for the Wiro Park and Orpheus Park playground. (U) $15,000,000 to the City of Calexico for the New River Parkway. (V) $8,500,000 for the City of Pico Rivera for the renovation of Rio Hondo Park. (W) $7,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the City of San Diego Parks & Recreation Department: Carmel Knolls Park comfort station; Carmel Mission Park comfort station; Penasquitos Creek Park Comfort Station; Sage Canyon Park concession building plus field renovation; Rancho Bernardo Community Park design and construction of sports field lighting, tennis courts, and parking lot ADA compliance improvements, including dog park off-leash area; Black Mountain Mine Open-Space Area Environmental Study; Canyonside Community Park Tennis Center Expansion, which includes a 5 percent State Parks administration fee. (X) $1,300,000 to the City of Lynwood for the Fernwood Avenue Park Project. (Y) $1,700,000 to the City of Alhambra for Alhambra Parks to build a pocket park, and upgrade, add Wi-Fi connectivity, electric charging stations, and book hold lockers at existing parks. (Z) $1,600,000 to the City of Long Beach for the completion of the El Dorado Regional Park Youth softball and baseball fields. (AA) $1,600,000 to the City of Long Beach for the Stearns Park softball and baseball field improvements. (AB) $1,000,000 to the City of Cupertino for the All-Inclusive Playground at Jollyman Park. (AC) $700,000 to the City of Yorba Linda for the Bryant Ranch Park improvement project. (AD) $2,300,000 to the City and County of San Francisco for the South Sunset clubhouse and playground renovation. (AE) $2,000,000 to the City of South Gate for community facilities, park, or recreation facilities construction, acquisition, or improvements, including, but not limited to, capital outlay related to the municipal auditorium, Hollydale Regional Park improvements, or Circle Park. (AF) $2,000,000 to the City of Corona for Phase II of Renovating Griffin Park. (AG) $2,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the South Clairemont Community Park recreation center. (AH) $2,000,000 for the City of San Diego for the Martin Luther King, Jr. Community Park Pool upgrade. (AI) $2,000,000 to the Lockeford Community Services District, Parks and Recreation, for building the Lockeford Memorial Park restroom, and for the Lockeford Community Center. (AJ) $6,000,000 to the City and County of San Francisco for the Portsmouth Square renovation. Of this amount: (i) $500,000 shall be used for clubhouse improvements, including kitchen facilities. (ii) $500,000 shall be used for culturally significant public art components in the Square. (iii) $1,000,000 shall be used for capital improvements to Walter U. Lum Place, such as pathways and pedestrian lighting. (iv) The remaining $4,000,000 shall be for additional capital improvements to Portsmouth Square as determined by the city. Any remaining funds not used for this purpose may be spent only for the purposes identified in subclauses (i) to (iii), inclusive. (AK) $3,200,000 to the City of South San Francisco for the Linden Park project. (AL) $3,000,000 for the East Bay Regional Park District for the creation of the first public Thurgood Marshall Regional Park access point. (AM) $2,900,000 to the City of Lakewood for the Lakewood Equestrian Center improvement project or for improvements or construction at other facilities designated by the city. (AN) $2,800,000 to the City of Irvine for the Sweet Shade Park Inclusive Playground. (AO) $10,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles Department of Parks and Recreation for the funding to convert a closed landfill into a new regional park. (AP) $700,000 to the City of Oakland for the Verdese Center Park renovation. (AQ) $300,000 to the City of Encinitas for portable lifeguard towers. (AR) $295,000 to the City of Oakland for Tassafaronga Park upgrades. (AS) $200,000 to the City of Encinitas for beach access improvements. (AT) $150,000 to the City of Encinitas for Olivenhain Trail Enhancement. (AU) $1,700,000 to the City and County of San Francisco, Department of Parks and Recreation, for the Noe Valley Town Square and Precita Park public restrooms; remaining funds would go towards future modular restrooms. (AV) $2,000,000 to the City of Bell Gardens for the Regional Aquatic Center at John Anson Ford Park. (AW) $8,500,000 to the City of Perris for the Foss Field Park renovation. (AX) $10,000,000 to the City of Costa Mesa for the park upgrades for Jack Hammett Sports Complex, TeWinkle Athletic Complex, Fairview Park Mesa, and Shalimar Park. (AY) $4,800,000 to the City of Tustin for the Centennial Park modernization and improvements. (AZ) $900,000 to the City of Lynwood for the Urban Bike Trails and Water Quality Improvements project. (BA) $5,000,000 to the City of Carlsbad for Carlsbad Veterans Memorial Park improvements. (BB) $3,500,000 to the City of Vista for Boys and Girls Club Indoor Soccer Arena project. (BC) $5,000,000 to the City of Hawthorne for the Hawthorne Community Center project. (BD) $2,000,000 to the City of Long Beach for the Houghton Park signature playground project. (BE) $6,000,000 to the City of San Diego for Balboa Park restroom repairs. (BF) $2,500,000 to the City of San Diego for the Emerald Hills Community Park project. (BG) $2,200,000 to the County of Mendocino for the Bower Park restoration project. (BH) $1,035,000 to the City of Oakland for Arroyo Viejo Park improvements. (BI) $9,000,000 to the County of Santa Clara for the Speed City Legacy Project. (BJ) $5,000,000 to the City of San Fernando for a one-time grant to the San Fernando Valley Boys and Girls Club to conduct building maintenance and safety upgrades, close the digital divide, modernize afterschool STEAM activities, and provide afterschool meals. (2) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency as follows: (A) $6,700,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the National Museum of the Surface Navy at the battleship USS Iowa. (B) $2,500,000 to the County of Los Angeles for the Conga Kids: “Discover the Diaspora” Assembly Program; Expansion of Conga Kids’ Premier Residency Programs in the County of Los Angeles; evaluation and curriculum development with UCLA-Luskin School of Social Welfare. (C) $20,000,000 to the City of Sacramento for various community reinvestment projects. (D) $7,200,000 to County of Ventura for the Ventura County Land Trust to complete the capital campaigns for two open space preserves, including an off-property Welcome Center and office space. (E) $6,000,000 to San Francisco Recreation and Parks Department for the Japantown Peace Plaza Renovation. (3) To be allocated by the State Air Resources Board as follows: (A) $3,000,000 for the Sacramento Metropolitan Air Quality Management District for Northern Sacramento air quality improvement projects. (4) To be allocated by the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy as follows: (A) $1,500,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for La Vina: Trail Completion – Altadena. (B) $10,000,000 for Open Space/Wildlife Linkage Acquisition – Mansdorf/Deer Creek Property. (5) To be allocated by the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy as follows: (A) $2,700,000 to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy (RMC) for Clara Oaks to purchase 100 acres of open space in Claremont. (B) $3,800,000 to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy for the walking trail along the San Gabriel River to the Pacific Ocean. (C) $50,000,000 for the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy (RMC): (i) $50,000,000 for the Southeast Los Angeles Cultural Center Project. (ii) The funds appropriated in this subparagraph shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2026. All or part of these funds may be transferred to a local or state department or agency for the purposes specified in this subparagraph. The funds shall be used for capital outlay related to the project, including, but not limited to, relocating the Los Angeles Flood Control District South Imperial Yard and costs related thereto, reimbursing state or local agencies that participate in that relocation, and funding design, development, and planning of the project by state or local agencies. (D) $7,000,000 for the Community Connections to Wildlands Program for Southeast Los Angeles County youth including, but not limited to, qualified capital outlay, programming costs, transportation costs, or necessary food and drink costs for program purposes. (6) To be allocated by the State Coastal Conservancy as follows: (A) $5,000,000 for the Santa Ana River Conservancy Program. (7) To be allocated by the Ocean Protection Council as follows: (A) $5,600,000 to the University of California, Santa Cruz, the California State University, Monterey Bay, Stanford University, and Center for Blue Economy at the Middlebury for White Shark Monitoring Technology. (B) $3,000,000 to the Monterey Bay Aquarium for the Monterey Bay Aquarium Sea Otters Tank. (8) To be allocated by the Department of Water Resources as follows: (A) $8,500,000 to the City of La Habra for the Coyote Creek and Imperial channel improvement project. (B) $3,000,000 to the City of Azusa for the replacement of the South Reservoir. (C) $21,800,000 to the Alameda County Public Works Agency for the Alameda Creek Restoration Phase III project. (9) To be allocated by the Department of Fish and Wildlife as follows: (A) $2,210,000 to the Greater Los Angeles Zoo Association for supporting community-building biodiversity awareness protection of endangered species and accessibility and inclusivity. (B) $1,900,000 for the City of Rancho Cucamonga for the Rancho Cucamonga Wildlife Detection Initiative. (10) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $2,000,000 to the City of Glendale for the restoration of the Casey Stengel Baseball Field historic Glendale landmark. (B) $10,400,000 to the Spanish Town Heritage Foundation through the County of Riverside Regional Park and Open Space District for the preservation of Trujillo Adobe. (C) $6,000,000 to the City of Fremont for the Savercat Sabercat Bridge and Trail project. (D) $1,500,000 to the City of Maywood for the Riverfront Park Renovation Project. (E) $600,000 to the City of San Diego for the Mountain View Park Sport Court. (11) $8,000,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for climate resilience projects. (12) To be allocated by the State Coastal Conservancy as follows: (A) $300,000 to the City of Encinitas for the Marine Safety Connected Coastlines. (B) $5,000,000 to the Palos Verdes Peninsula Land Conservancy for habitat restoration and wildlife mitigation in Rancho Palos Verdes. (13) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $1,200,000 to the City of Rolling Hills Estates Nature Center for construction costs of the Nature Center. (B) $8,500,000 to the City of Pico Rivera for the Smith Park Aquatics Center Renovation. (C) $2,750,000 to the City of La Mirada for the Behringer Park Athletic Field Renovations. (D) $4,450,000 to the City of Redwood to convert downtown Redwood City Parking lots to active park spaces and the creation of the Redwood Creek trail via new boardwalks and pathways. (E) $4,000,000 to the City of Stockton for aquatics and parks facilities. (F) $5,000,000 to the Los Angeles Neighborhood Land Trust county-based nonprofit for the Clara Park Renovation Project and the Maywood Riverfront Park Renovation Project. (G) $5,000,000 to Discovery Cube Los Angeles for the Sustainability Park Project. (14) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the Trust For Public Land for urban greening and sustainable infrastructure in Pacoima. (B) $1,000,000 to the San Diego Unified School District for the development of the EarthLab Open-Air Climate Park. (15) To be allocated by the State Coastal Conservancy as follows: (A) $2,500,000 to the Land Conservancy of San Luis Obispo County for the Camatta Ranch Preservation. (B) $1,500,000 to the Cayucos Land Conservancy for the Toro Coast Preserve Project. (C) $3,000,000 to the Coastal Conservancy for environmental cleanup, water supply studies, and public access projects in the Eel and Russian River watersheds. (16) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $2,000,000 to the City of Arcata for Humboldt Crabs Ball Park and Carlson City Park improvements. (B) $1,200,000 to the City of Costa Mesa for the Ketchcum-Libolt Park Upgrades. (C) $800,000 to the City of Santa Clara for the Magical Bridge All-Inclusive Playground in Central Park. (D) $2,300,000 to the City of Hermosa Beach for the renovation of the Hermosa Beach Pier. (E) $6,000,000 to the City of Agoura Hills for the Linear Park Project. (17) $1,300,000 to the Puente Hills Habitat Preservation Authority to provide funding for ranger services for firefighting, law enforcement, outdoor education, and protection of the natural resources for trail visitors. (18) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency, $10,000,000 to Discovery Cube Orange County to purchase property adjacent to the science museum and nearby Santiago Creek for construction of an open-air, hands-on STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Education) Center. or to be used for capital improvements. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Budget Act of 2026, these funds are available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2030. (19) To be allocated by the Arts Council, $2,500,000 to the City of Palm Springs for the renovation of the Palm Springs Plaza Theater. (20) $7,000,000 to the City of Carson for the City facilities, parks, and community infrastructure. (21) $6,000,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for the Open Space/Wildlife Linkage Acquisition: protection/acquisition in the Santa Susana Mountains adjacent to existing public parkland. (22) To be allocated by the State Coastal Conservancy as follows: (A) $36,000,000 for the East Bay Recreation and Park District for the Point Molate open space acquisition and clean up. (B) $15,000,000 to the City of Berkeley for the Marina and Pier projects. (23) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $3,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Olive Grove Community Park upgrades. (B) $8,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Ward Canyon Park expansion and completion. (C) $150,000 to the City of San Diego for the Serra Mesa trail improvements. (24) $5,000,000 to the State Coastal Conservancy for Phase 2 of the Maritime Museum of San Diego redevelopment project. (25) $1,260,000 to the County of San Diego for the Casa Familiar for creation of Avanzando San Ysidro Community Land Trust. (26) $175,000 to San Diego River Conservancy for San Diego Regional Quality Control Board for technical assistance services. (27) $2,000,000 to the State Coastal Conservancy for the City of San Diego for the Camino de la Costa Viewpoint Coastal and Beach access projects. (28) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $4,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Clay Park Improvements. (B) $600,000 to the City of Taft for the West Side Recreation and Park District for Natatorium swimming pool. (C) $50,000 to the San Diego Mountain Biking Association for the trail restoration in the Mount Laguna Recreation Area. (D) $7,000,000 to the City of Santa Clarita to acquire open space property to preserve the property and protect the natural ecological and historical resources located on the property in perpetuity. (E) $10,200,000 to the City of Long Beach for the East Long Beach El Dorado Park improvements. (29) $150,000 to the Los Angeles Community Garden Council to support two community gardens. (30) $150,000 to the Friends of the LA River for conservation efforts. (31) $100,000,000 to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for grants to local educational agencies and nonprofit childcare facilities receiving government funding for projects consistent with the Urban Forestry Act within schoolsites or properties used by child care facilities that reduce the ambient temperature, including by supporting the urban forest, provided that no less than 30 percent of these funds shall be available for grants to nonprofit child care facilities receiving government funding. (32) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency, California Cultural and Historical Endowment, $5,000,000 for the Great Wall of Los Angeles for the interpretive green bridge. (33) To be allocated by the Wildlife Conservation Board as follows, $3,000,000 for a one-time grant to 40-Acre Conservation League for land conservation, habitat restoration, climate preservation, and wildlife wildfire prevention projects. (c) EDUCATION (1) To be allocated by the State Department of Education as follows: (A) $500,000 to the County of Kern for the ShePower Leadership Academy. (1.5) To be allocated by the Department of General Services, Office of Public School Construction as follows: (A) $3,700,000 to OneGeneration for the Expansion Capitol Project. (B) $1,400,000 to the City of Redwood City for the Fair Oaks School turf and light replacement. (C) $500,000 to the Palos Verdes Peninsula Unified School District for facility upgrades. (D) $2,500,000 to Del Norte Unified School District (DNUSD) for architectural work to build a performing arts center at the High School. (E) $200,000 to the Southern Humboldt Unified School District (SHUSD) for feasibility study student for converting campus building into permanent educator and workforce housing. (F) $10,000,000 to the Berryessa Union School District for the Piedmont Middle School gymnasium and window replacement. (G) $3,500,000 to the Torrance Unified School District for solar covered parking lots for high school campuses. (H) The Office of Public School Construction may require the entities specified in this paragraph (1.5) to be subject to any applicable public school construction statutory or regulatory compliance and accountability requirements, as determined by the Office of Public School Construction. (I) The Office of Public School Construction may utilize funding authorized for administrative purposes from existing General Fund appropriations as necessary to allocate funding to the entities specified in this paragraph (1.5). (2) To be allocated by the University of California as follows: (A) $5,000,000 to the University of California, San Diego for the Student Mental Health App development. (B) $10,500,000 to the University of California for the UC and CSU Collaborative for Neurodiversity and Learning. (C) $4,000,000 to the University of California, Davis, for the Equine Performance and Rehabilitation Center. (D) $500,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles, for the Asian Pacific American Leadership Foundation for anti-bias education and outreach in partnership with UCLA Asian American Studies Center. (E) $25,000,000 to the University of California, Berkeley, for grants to expand coverage of local public affairs throughout the state. (F) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles, for the CalKIDS Institute, to be used over the course of five years for research, policy, and direct services to promote socioeconomic justice by ensuring that all individuals, groups, and communities have the tools necessary to achieve financial capability and well-being. (3) To be allocated by the California State University as follows: (A) $10,000,000 to the California State University, San Bernardino through the California State University Chancellor’s Office for one-time support to the CSU San Bernardino Masters of Science in Physician Assistant (MSPA) program. (B) $6,000,000 to the California State University, San Diego for the State University East Park and Bike Path Improvement. (C) $3,000,000 to the California State University, San Jose for the State University Moss Landing Marine Laboratory Dock. (D) $2,000,000 to the California State University Channel Islands (CSUCI) for the CSUCI Early Childhood Education Center Capital Project. (E) $1,300,000 to the California State University, Sacramento for improvements to the campus childcare center; development of an artificial intelligence mixed reality classroom. (F) $2,000,000 to the California State University, Fullerton for the CSUF Center for Healthy Neighborhoods. (G) $4,000,000 to the California State University, Fresno for CSU Fresno Mobile Health Units. (H) $5,000,000 to California State University, Dominguez Hills, for the California Black Women’s Think Tank. (I) $1,000,000 to the California Polytechnic State University, Strawberry Center, for emerging strawberry disease research in Monterey and Santa Cruz counties. (4) To be allocated by the California Student Aid Commission as follows: (A) $600,000 to the Cerritos Community College District for one-time support for the Student Transit Fare-less System Initiative - Cerritos College. (5) $5,970,000 to the Associated Students of the University of California, Los Angeles for operational costs, including, but not limited to, utilities, student union, student programming, and academic materials. The amount allocated shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2024. (6) To be allocated by the Department of Technology, as follows, $5,000,000 to the County of Santa Clara to provide the County of Santa Clara’s Office of Education a one-time pass through of funds for development and support of an integrated data system. The Santa Clara County Office of Education shall be the sole administrator of the data system and shall retain sole ownership of all data. (7) $5,000,000 California Children and Families Commission (First 5) to the County of Solano for the First 5 Solano Children and Families Commission to convert a shuttered school into an Early Learning Center. (8) $1,200,000 to the Department of Education for Parents, Educator/Teachers, and Students in Action (PESA) for truancy and absenteeism prevention programming. (9) To be allocated by the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development as follows: (A) $2,000,000 for the County of Los Angeles for the Florence-Firestone Technology Career Incubator site acquisition and capital improvements. (B) $1,500,000 to Initiate Change in Our Neighborhoods for a Small Business Incubator and Training Facility in San Fernando Valley. (10) To be allocated by the Department of Education as follows: (A) $500,000 for Poway Unified School District, Escondido Union High School District, and San Marcos Unified School District to support and expand the Step Out Lead Everyday (SOLE) Effects Program. (11) To be allocated by the State Library as follows: (A) $1,900,000 to the City of San Diego to provide funding for improvements at the University Community Branch Library. (B) $500,000 to the Latino Legacy Foundation for the multimedia online book project. (C) $3,000,000 to the City of Downey for the New Downey Family YMCA. (12) To be allocated by the California Student Aid Commission, $1,400,000 to Promises2Kids for the Guardian to Gateway Project. (13) To be allocated by the California Workforce Development Board as follows: (A) $3,500,000 to the City of Compton for the P-Tech Conversion of Roosevelt High. (B) $300,000 to the New Filmmakers Los Angeles for high school mentorship programs. (14) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services, $700,000 to the Trinity Alps Unified School District (TAUSD) for generators to assist the school district to serve as a shelter for fire and winter storm evacuees. (d) PUBLIC SAFETY AND FIRE PREVENTION (1) To be allocated by the Judicial Council as follows: (A) $500,000 to the City of Redondo Beach for the Homeless Courts Program to continue their homeless court program, which helps participants into housing and provides them with services that facilitate stabilization, such as mental health, alcohol and substance abuse, and access to job training. (2) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections as follows: (A) $5,000,000 to the County of Orange for the Transitional Youth Housing Facility construction. (3) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the Southern Marin Fire Protection District for the Southern Marin Fire Protection District, vegetation management and evacuation route capacity improvements. (B) $1,500,000 to the County of Kings for the Kings County Fire Department upgrades. (C) $1,100,000 to the City of Glendale for the Active Transportation and Wildfire Prevention Infrastructure. (D) $5,000,000 to the San Bernardino County Fire Protection District for the Hesperia High Desert Fire Headquarters project. (E) $1,500,000 to the City of Rancho Palos Verdes for a wildfire detection system for the Palos Verde peninsula. (F) $800,000 to the Moraga-Orinda Fire District for a Three-Year Pilot Program for Two Wildland Fire Specialists to Work with Residents to Mitigate Fire Risk. (G) $20,000 to the County of Los Angeles, Sheriff’s Department, for trailer repair. (4) To be allocated by the California Conservation Corps as follows: (A) $3,000,000 to the California Conservation Corps Foundation (CCCF) for capacity building and continued and expanded programming in support of the California Conservation Corps corpsmembers and the State of California. (5) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services as follows: (A) $5,000,000 to the County of Merced for the Merced County Public Safety Radio System Replacement. (B) $1,000,000 to the Reclamation District 1001 (RD 1001) for the RD 1001 Pump Station. (C) $1,000,000 to the City of San Diego Police for the Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force (ICAC) for updated training, new investigator positions, and the ever-evolving specialized equipment needed to protect sexual exploitation and the arrest of sexual predators. (D) $1,000,000 to the City of Santa Rosa for the Roseland 8 fire station. (E) $1,000,000 to the City of Sausalito for sea level rise mitigation. (F) $2,000,000 to the San Marcos Fire Department for two needed projects for the department. (G) $500,000 to the Los Angeles Fire Department for the two new heli-hydrant locations and automatic fill valve retrofits. (H) $200,000 to the City of Corona for the Community Wildfire Protection Plan. (I) $5,200,000 to the City of Palo Alto for the replacement of Fire Station 4 that is operationally and technologically deficient. (J) $5,000,000 to the City of Fowler for new police headquarters. (K) $7,000,000 to the County of San Bernardino for the New Fire Station Construction in San Bernardino Supervisorial District 5. (L) $8,100,000 to the Amador Fire Protection District for a new Amador Fire Protection District Fire Station. (M) $8,000,000 to the Deer Springs Fire Protection District for the District Station 2 Permanent Facility. (N) $13,000,000 to the Sacramento Metropolitan Fire District for the Zinfandel Fire Training Facility. (O) $1,000,000 to the San Bernardino County Fire District for firefighting equipment for the Wrightwood Station. (P) $1,250,000 to the City of King for the acquisition of a Quint Aerial Apparatus and Security Camera System. (Q) $2,000,000 to the City of Soledad for a fire engine. (6) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections as follows: (A) $250,000 to the City of Coalinga for public safety technology upgrades and improvements. (B) $1,500,000 to the City of Mendota for a new police station and council chambers. (C) $10,000,000 for the Medication-Assisted Treatment Grant Program, pursuant to Sections 6047.1 to 6047.4, inclusive, of the Penal Code. (7) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation, $1,200,000 to the City of Los Angeles for drought resistant landscaping and irrigation along San Vicente Boulevard to support the City’s biodiversity initiatives. (8) To be allocated by the Office Emergency Services as follows: (A) $3,000,000 to the City of Merced for capital costs for Merced Regional Fire Training Station, phase 1. (B) $10,000,000 to the City of Porterville for an Emergency Operator Center. (C) $5,000,000 to the City of Sanger for the renovation of an outdated dispatch center. (D) $2,000,000 to the Lemoore Volunteer Fire Department for new fire department updated equipment and training. (E) $7,000,000 to the City of Farmersville for fire station construction. (9) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections as follows: (A) $2,500,000 to the City of Parlier for updating a police station. (B) $6,000,000 to the City of Shafter for new fire and police substation construction. (C) $7,000,000 to the City of Woodlake for a new Civic Center, Police Department, and City Hall Administration and Citizen Service Center. (10) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services as follows: (A) $2,000,000 for the City of Dinuba for fire department equipment and training. (B) $2,000,000 to the City of Lindsay for updating fire equipment and training. (C) $2,750,000 to the Fresno County Fire Protection District for new fire station and equipment. (D) $4,500,000 to the City of Selma for new fire station construction. construction and the purchase of fire apparatus and equipment. These funds are available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2029. (E) $4,000,000 to Kings County Fire Department for updating fire facilities and equipment. (F) $1,500,000 to the City of Reedley for updating outdated communication equipment for police and fire departments. (G) $5,000,000 to the City of Santa Rosa for the Fire Station 8 replacement. (H) $16,950,000 to the Orange County Fire Authority for the new Wildland Hand Crew Station, vehicles, and equipment. (I) $7,000,000 for grants to municipal entities for costs of municipal public services related to 2026 FIFA World Cup matches in Northern California and Southern California. The funds shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure through June 30, 2027. In consultation with affected local governments, the Office of Emergency Services shall distribute grants pursuant to a methodology it develops, which includes considerations that communities hosting more matches and higher-profile matches during the World Cup shall receive priority for funding. (J) $7,000,000 to the Indian Valley Community Services District for Greenville recovery and rebuilding costs resulting from the Dixie Fire. (K) $2,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles to reimburse public safety costs incurred due to the Summit of the Americas. (11) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections as follows: (A) $250,000 to Northeast Graffiti Busters for field equipment and supplies. (B) $555,000 to Champions in Service for tattoo removal services. (C) $200,000 to the Colton Police Department for the purchase of two off-highway vehicles, a tow vehicle, and safety gear. (D) $1,000,000 to the California Police Activities League for the Youth Apprenticeship Readiness Accelerator (YARA) Program. Of this amount, $500,000 shall be allocated for the YARA program in Ventura County and $500,000 shall be allocated to support the expansion of the program to Santa Barbara County. (E) $8,000,000 to the North Orange County Public Safety Collaborative via the Board of State and Community Corrections to continue collaboration efforts. (F) $1,500,000 to the City of Suisun City for public safety upgrades. These funds are available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2028. (12) To be allocated by the Judicial Council, $1,500,000 to the Judicial Council for the County of Riverside for the California Court of Appeal, Fourth District, Division Two (Riverside). (13) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services as follows: (A) $3,500,000 to the City of Rancho Cucamonga for the CORE Academy Training Facility. (B) $3,000,000 to the Wilton Fire Protection District for a new fire station and training facility. (C) $2,000,000 to the San Diego Zoo Safari Park for wildfire mitigation projects. (D) $500,000 to the North County Fire Protection District for the new Fire Station #4. (E) $250,000 to the City of Escondido for the Escondido Fire Department Critical Infrastructure of response headsets and training tower refurbishment. (e) WATER, DROUGHT, AND OTHER INFRASTRUCTURE (1) To be allocated by the Department of Water Resources as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the Marin Municipal Water District for the San Geronimo Emergency Generator. (B) $1,800,000 to the City of Yucaipa for the Upper Wildwood Creek Basin Project. (C) $9,000,000 to the County of Napa for water infrastructure and wildfire related needs in the cities of St. Helena and Napa and to support the American Canyon Boys and Girls Club. (D) $200,000 to Brawley Tower Removal for the removal of the Brawley Tower located at 964 H Street, City of Brawley. (E) $6,163,000 to the Monterey County Water Resources Agency for Nacimiento Dam Maintenance projects. (F) $2,000,000 to the Big Sur Land Trust for a green infrastructure project to reduce flood risks and restore habitat. (G) $1,500,000 to the City of Santa Rosa for water use efficiency appliances. (H) $3,000,000 to the City of Pasadena for the Rose Bowl Gas and Water Infrastructure Improvements. (I) $5,000,000 for research, proof of concept, and a preliminary feasibility study related to a project for the inter-basin conveyance of water. The department may award a sole source grant to a non-profit organization or government agency with experience in administering government funding for environmental sustainability projects and partnerships with other entities with experience in the field of inter-basin water conveyance. (J) $6,000,000 to the City of Merced for the Merced Creek restoration project. (K) $5,000,000 to the City of Buena Park for water system improvements. (L) $2,000,000 for Dry Wine Grape Farming Outreach to provide funds through the Water Use Efficiency Program to any of the following: nonprofit organizations, resource conservation districts, or the University of California Cooperative Extension. The funds shall be used to provide outreach and education to wine grape growers on the dry farming of coastal wine grapes. The funds appropriated in this paragraph shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2025. (2) To be allocated by the State Water Resources Control Board as follows: (A) $2,500,000 to the City of Ridgecrest for wastewater treatment plant construction activities related to the new facility. (B) $8,600,000 to the Fairfield-Suisun Sewer District for the Kellogg Resiliency Project. (C) $2,100,000 to the City of Montebello for the Downtown Sewer Infrastructure Improvement Project. (D) $3,000,000 to the City of San Juan Bautista for the Wastewater Project. (E) $5,000,000 to the Patterson Irrigation District for construction of the East-West Conveyance system between the San Joaquin River and the Delta Mendota Canal. (F) $5,000,000 to the City of Madera for the Avenue 13 (Pecan Ave.) Sewer Trunk Main Rehab Phase 1. (G) $7,000,000 to the City of San Fernando for a Nitrate Water Treatment system in Well 2A. (H) $4,800,000 to the Monterey Peninsula Water Management District for the Pure Water Monterey Deep Injection Well No. 6 project. (I) $1,000,000 to the City of Monterey for the Lake El Estero Stormwater Diversion to Sanitary Sewer. (J) $7,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles Bureau of Sanitation for the Hollenbeck Park Lake Rehabilitation and Stormwater Management. (K) $1,000,000 for the Deep Water Intake Location Desalination Study. (3) To be allocated by the California Energy Commission, $4,500,000 to the City of Menlo Park for the citywide electrification project. (4) $17,000,000 to the City of Culver City for smart city technology to purchase and to install smart nodes on city streetlight arms. (5) $1,000,000 to the County of San Luis Obispo for the Deep Water Port Feasibility Study for Offshore Wind Procurement. (6) To be allocated by the San Diego River Conservancy, $2,000,000 to the East County Advanced Water Purification Joint Powers Authority (JPA) for the East County Advanced Water Purification Program. (7) To be allocated by the Wildlife Conservation Board, $15,000,000 to the Resource Conservation District of the Santa Monica Mountains to assist in the recovery of the federally endangered southern steelhead trout (Oncorhynchus mykiss) found in the Santa Monica Mountains with habitat restoration, genetic preservation, and hatcheries. (f) LIBRARIES AND CULTURAL INSTITUTIONS (1) To be allocated by the Department of General Services as follows: (A) $110,000 to the Department of General Services for the Vietnam Veterans Memorial repairs. (B) $2,000,000 to Department of General Services for the International Genocide Memorial. (2) To be allocated by the California State Library as follows: (A) $1,500,000 to the City of San Gabriel for the Asian Youth Center. (B) $14,250,000 to the University of Southern California Institute for American Studies for the TUMO Center. (C) $10,000,000 to the City of Sierra Madre to provide funding for the Sierra Madre Library. (D) $3,000,000 to the City of Elk Grove for the Elk Grove Library for enhanced technology, community meeting space, and needed tenant improvements. (E) $1,300,000 to the City of San Mateo for the Marina Library Reconstruction. (F) $500,000 to the City of Irwindale for the Public Library Improvements, site grading, a new 2-story building, library equipment, community room, mining library, ADA accessible rooms, seating areas, a parking area and surrounding hard/landscape. (G) $400,000 to the Placentia Library District / City of Placentia for the Bookmobile REAd (Reading Engine Adventures) program. (H) $5,000,000 to the City of Pasadena for the Pasadena Central Library Seismic Retrofit. (I) $3,000,000 to the County of Merced for the construction of the Dos Palos Library and rehabilitation of the Del Hale Hall community center. (J) $5,000,000 to the City of Santa Rosa for building a permanent library for Roseland, an extremely disadvantaged community within Santa Rosa. (K) $1,500,000 to the City of San Diego for the San Carlos Library Phase 1 funding. (L) $20,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Oak Park Library construction. (M) $5,000,000 to the City of Chula Vista for the land and entitlement costs for new library. (N) $4,500,000 to the City of San Diego for the Ocean Beach Library expansion. (O) $25,000,000 to the City of Chula Vista for the Cinematic Arts Library. (P) $6,095,000 to the City of Glendale for Glendale Central Library capital outlay and maintenance. (Q) $2,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Hillel San Diego for the construction of the Beverly and Joseph Glickman Hillel Center. (2.1) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $2,000,000 for the Warner Center Transportation Technology Infrastructure & Innovation Zone (WCTTIIZ). (3) To be allocated by the California Arts Council as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Building 178 Performing Arts Center. (B) $7,000,000 to the City of Fresno for the Fresno Arts and Facilities to support and expand the cultural arts and their associated facilities in the City of Fresno, supporting the city in preservation, operation, and maintenance costs for facilities such as Arte Americas. (C) $7,000,000 to the Inner City Youth Orchestra for capital costs for the rehearsal and administrative headquarters. (D) $400,000 to the Mid Valley YMCA for a New Youth Institute of Media Arts. (E) $800,000 to Tia Chucha’s Centro Cultural for Arts-based community wellness programming. (F) $5,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the restoration of the Villa Montezuma. (G) $8,000,000 to the City of Guadalupe and Housing Authority of Santa Barbara County (HASBARCO) for the renovation of the historical Royal Theatre and construction of community services center. (H) $2,100,000 to the Studio T Arts & Entertainment for equipment purchases. (I) $10,500,000 for the Pomona Performing Arts Centers. (J) $10,000,000 to the City of Santa Monica for the City Yards Modernization. (4) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the City of Monterey Park for the Vincent Price Art Museum - East Los Angeles College. (B) $2,500,000 to the National Animation Museum (nonprofit) for museum development. (C) $3,000,000 to the City of Azusa for the relocation and preservation of the Old Schoolhouse. (D) $5,500,000 for the LGBTQ Museum. (E) $500,000 for the Tenderloin Museum. (F) $2,100,000 to the California Academy of Science to support the Thriving California Environmental Learning Plan. (G) $3,300,000 to the City of San Diego for the San Diego Natural History Museum for elevators replacement, roof replacement, collections storage restoration, coil system, and building security improvements. (H) $800,000 for the Children’s Creativity Museum. (I) $3,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for building El Museo de Arte Chicano en Los Angeles (Museum of Chicano Art in Los Angeles) in the heart of Boyle Heights. (J) $3,200,000 to the City of Pomona for the Historical Society of Pomona Valley to repair the historic Pomona Ebell Museum. (K) $200,000 to the Ramona Town Hall Association for the Historical Site Redevelopment. (L) $5,000,000 to the California Science Center Foundation for the Air and Space Center. (M) $250,000 to the Oakland Museum for the Digitization project. (5) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $3,000,000 to the County of Stanislaus for the Bonita Pool Project and Leroy F. Fitzsimmons Memorial Park. (B) $1,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Marston House restoration and repair work. (C) $500,000 to the City of San Diego for the Mountainview Sports Courts tennis court renovation. (g) TRANSPORTATION (1) To be allocated by the Department of Transportation as follows: (A) $6,500,000 to the County of Yolo for the Capay Valley Community and Health Center. (B) $5,000,000 to the City of Cupertino for the reconstruction of the McClellan Road Bridge. (C) $1,000,000 to the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority (SBCTA) to conduct a State Route 247 / 62 Emergency Bypass Lane Study. (D) $2,100,000 to the City of Burbank for the Transportation, Electric Vehicle, and Pedestrian Infrastructure Improvements. (E) $4,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the Griffith Park Active Transportation, Safety, and Facility Infrastructure Improvements. (F) $2,000,000 for the Toluca Lake Beautification Partners (TLBP) to expand their Public Private Partnership with Caltrans District 7 for the purposes of revitalizing and enhancing additional freeway sites and underpasses. (G) $2,000,000 to the City of Oxnard for the Rice Ave Over Crossing – Utility Relocation. (H) $1,900,000 to the City of Los Angeles, Department of Transportation, for the Chandler Protected Bike Lane Gap Closure. (I) $20,000,000 to the City of Stockton for the Miracle Mile Pedestrian Crossing Improvements, including Pedestrian Crossing Upgrades Improvements, Public Safety Improvements, and Revitalization Improvements. The Department of Transportation shall convene a Miracle Mile ad hoc workgroup from members of the community at large, including the office of the local Assembly Member, for the purpose of making recommendations to the City of Stockton on how to fulfill the requirements of this subparagraph (I). The City of Stockton shall have until January 1, 2028, to spend down the funds to fulfill the requirements of this subparagraph. (J) $5,000,000 to the Tri-Valley-San Joaquin Regional Rail Authority for the Valley Link Rail Project (Environmental Study and Preliminary Engineering), Cities of Danville, Dublin, Livermore, Pleasanton, and San Ramon. (K) $6,000,000 to the County of Kings Department of Public Works for the Kettleman City Pedestrian Bridge. (L) $1,400,000 to the Port of San Diego for the projects to address abandoned and derelict vessels at Zuniga Shoal. (M) $14,300,000 to the County of Alameda for the Installation of Roundabouts: Crow Canyon Road. (N) $10,000,000 to the City of San Jose for the East San Jose Corridor Safety Improvement Project. (O) $1,500,000 to the San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency (SFMTA) for the Sloat between Skyline and Great Highway. (P) $1,200,000 to the San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency (SFMTA) for the Sloat Skyline traffic signal. (Q) $5,000,000 to the Port of Hueneme for the installation of electrical infrastructure to support electric cranes on the wharf port’s terminals for unloading cargo. (R) $7,500,000 to the City of San Fernando for the Pacoima Wash Pedestrian Bridge. (S) $4,500,000 to the City of Simi Valley for the Simi Valley Metrolink Safety Improvement & Quiet Corridor to build a second train track in the City in an effort to improve safety, increase service, and make the existing service more reliable. (T) $3,200,000 to the City of Daly City for the Safe Routes to Schools. (U) $2,000,000 to the City of Paramount for the West Santa Ana Branch Bikeway Project. (V) $1,300,000 to the City of Anaheim, Anaheim Transportation Network (ATN), towards the construction of the Anaheim Transportation Network Facilities. (W) $1,000,000 to the City of Milpitas for the Milpitas Bike Lanes Facilities Enhancement. (X) $3,000,000 to the Peninsula Corridor Joint Powers Board (CalTrain) for the CalTrain Wireless Optimized Crossing System. (Y) $2,000,000 to the City of Palo Alto for the replacement of the Newell Road Bridge over San Francisquito Creek. (Z) $2,000,000 to the City of Gardena for the revitalization of Gardena Boulevard. (AA) $3,000,000 to the City of Paso Robles for the Creston Road Active Transportation and Bike and School Access improvements. (AB) $2,500,000 to the Monterey-Salinas Transit District for Busway construction. (AC) $4,500,000 to the City of Ontario for Safety Improvements for parks, road safety, and youth services. (AD) $20,000,000 to the Transportation Authority of Marin (TAM) for the Transportation Project to Combat Sea Level Rise, to fund interim solutions for Highway 37 in Marin County. (AE) $10,000,000 to the Transportation Authority of Marin (TAM) for the flooding issues in Marin City along Highway 101. (AF) $4,800,000 to the City of Santa Monica for the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Streetscape (LiNC) to construct medians and bulbouts to promote efficient vehicular travel and enhance pedestrian safety. (AG) $6,000,000 to the City of Fremont for the Fremont I-680/Sabercat Bridge. (AH) $3,500,000 to the City of Belmont for the Belmont Alameda De Las Pulgas Corridor Project. (AI) $5,000,000 to the Bay Area Rapid Transit for the Downtown Berkeley elevator repair and rehabilitation. (AJ) $2,200,000 to the City of Del Mar for the Federal Highway Bridge Program matching funds. (AK) $2,000,000 to the City of Clovis for the Pedestrian Bridge. (AL) $8,000,000 to the County of Placer to remove the steel and concrete wreckage of the former State Route (SR) 49 Bridge that lies in the American River. (AM) $5,000,000 to the County of Kern for the road repairs in the unincorporated town of Woody. (AN) $9,300,000 to the Town of Paradise for the Road Rehabilitation and Maintenance, Town of Paradise. (AO) $2,000,000 to the University of Redlands for a plaza and walkway project for the University of Redlands Rail station at the terminus of the Arrow Line in San Bernardino County. (AP) $1,000,000 to the Solano Transportation Authority (STA) for Electric Vehicle Infrastructure in the Cities of Vacaville, Fairfield, Suisun City and Rio Vista. (AQ) $12,000,000 to the City of Compton for the Artesia Boulevard Bridge. (AR) $10,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the Los Angeles Cleantech Incubator (LACI) transportation electrification program. (AS) $5,000,000 to the City of Glendale for active transportation infrastructure. (AT) $5,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the LARiverWay active transportation infrastructure in San Fernando Valley. (AU) $9,000,000 to the City of Inglewood for the Inglewood Connector. (AV) $3,000,000 to the City of Burbank for active transportation infrastructure. (AW) $2,000,000 to the City of Newark for Quiet Zone Safety Improvements. (AX) $1,200,000 to the City of Saratoga to improve pedestrian rail crossings. (AY) $1,000,000 to the Bay Area Rapid Transit District for El Cerrito BART Plaza Station Area and Access Enhancements. (AZ) $760,000 to the City/County Association of Governments of San Mateo County for the San Bruno-Millbrae Bike Lane. (BA) $7,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for Broadway South traffic safety projects. (h) HOUSING, HOMELESSNESS PREVENTION, AND FOOD ACCESS (1) To be allocated by the Department of Housing and Community Development as follows: (A) $8,000,000 to the County of Santa Cruz, Human Services Department, Housing for Health Division, for the Harvey West Studios Supportive Housing project. (B) $1,400,000 to The Boys and Girls Club of the Los Angeles Harbor for the Department of Housing and Community Development Child Care Services loan (L01-0104). (C) $1,200,000 to the City of Fairfield for the Shelter SOLANO Dining Hall and Kitchen Construction. (D) $15,000,000 to the Riverside County Housing Authority for the Housing Catalyst in Coachella Valley. (E) $8,000,000 to the City of East Palo Alto for the 965 Weeks Street Affordable Housing Development to create 136 homes for low-income families. (F) $2,100,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the San Fernando Valley Community Mental Health Center Homeless Street Pilot Program. (G) $500,000 to the Tenderloin Neighborhood Development Center for the Community space in Sunset District affordable housing project. (H) $16,000,000 to the City of Manteca for a Homelessness Navigation Center. (I) $1,000,000 to the City of Stockton and the Stockton Homeless Shelter for a navigation center project. (J) $5,000,000 to the Goodness Village for capital costs for tiny homes, a community center and a laundry facility. (K) $1,000,000 to the Hope of the Valley Rescue Mission for Homeless Services. (L) $13,000,000 to the County of Ventura for the conversion and modernization of a county administrative building into a shelter/residential use, a Homeless Transition Center and Permanent Supportive Housing complex, and expansion of the Modernization of the Nyeland Acres Community Center. (M) $3,000,000 to the Richardson Bay Regional Authority (RBRA) for supporting Immediate Homeless Housing Needs. (N) $2,000,000 to the County of Marin for supporting Immediate Homeless Housing Needs in Marin County. (O) $3,000,000 to the Sierra Health Foundation for the Pilot Program to Feed Families and Help Restaurants impacted by pandemic. (P) $23,000,000 to the City of Glendale for the Burbank-Glendale-Pasadena Regional Housing Trust to be used to help finance affordable housing projects. (Q) $10,000,000 to the San Gabriel Valley Regional Housing Trust for affordable housing and homelessness projects. (R) $10,000,000 to the Los Angeles County Department of Mental Health for the support of the Los Angeles County Homeless Outreach and Mobile Engagement (HOME) program, Mobile Crisis Outreach Teams, and Haven Hills expansion. Of this amount, $2,500,000 shall be allocated for the expansion of Haven Hills, and $7,500,000, in consultation with the City of Los Angeles, shall be allocated for outreach services and behavioral health infrastructure in the San Fernando Valley. (S) $4,900,000 to the Orange County United Way for the affordable and supportive housing service for voucher holders experiencing homelessness in Orange County. (T) $5,700,000 to the City of Hayward for Mission Paradise for programming to support homeless and seriously mentally ill households. (U) $5,000,000 to Mercy Housing for the Sunnydale HUB project for a community center. (V) $20,000,000 to the Satellite Affordable Housing Associates for Bridge Financing for two affordable housing projects. (W) $500,000 to the Bananas Parent Voices for the Homelessness Families CARE Program. (X) $500,000 to the City of Fremont for the Fremont Housing Navigation Center. (Y) $800,000 to the City of San Jose for the Responsible Landlord Engagement Initiative 2.0. (Z) $1,500,000 to the City of Milpitas for Milpitas Homelessness Prevention and Unhoused Services. (AA) $6,000,000 to the City of Fullerton for the Navigation Center Project. (AB) $5,000,000 to the County of San Bernardino for Youth Diversion funds to expand At Risk Youth Diversion Education Services College Exodus Diversion Project. (AC) $5,000,000 to the City of Santa Rosa for the Caritas Center, housing-focused service center. (AD) $250,000 to the East Bay Community Law Center for the Housing Legal Assistance program. (AE) $3,000,000 to the Bridge to Home SCV to develop an interim housing and homeless services facility in the Santa Clarita Valley. (AF) $25,000,000 to the County of Sacramento to address the concerns of unpermitted homeless population on the American River Parkway. (AG) $5,400,000 to the City of Hayward for the Scattered Site Housing Model to Create Cost-Effective Permanent Housing for unhoused individuals. (AH) $5,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles for The California Endowment in support of the Hope Village project. (AI) $3,000,000 to Butterfly’s Haven for the Treehouse Leimert Park affordable housing project. (AJ) $1,000,000 for the Pet Assistance and Support (PAS) Program for qualified homeless shelters and domestic violence shelters to provide shelter, food, and basic veterinary services for pets owned by individuals experiencing homelessness or victims of domestic violence. (2) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services as follows: (A) $20,000,000 to the Coalition for Humane Immigrant Rights (CHIRLA) for capital costs for the Los Angeles Welcome Center for Immigrants and Refugees and a Home for The Coalition for Humane Immigrant Rights. (B) $9,000,000 to the County of San Joaquin for the renovation of a county-owned building to serve as an additional 16-bed impatient Psychiatric Health Facility. (C) $7,000,000 to the Partnership for Growth Los Angeles for garden infrastructure improvements and food distribution network. (D) $1,500,000 to the City of Santa Monica for the Behavioral Health Center to support behavioral health needs of vulnerable residents with around-the-clock response, including access to safe temporary housing and stabilizing care. (E) $1,500,000 to the Sunset Youth Services for Capital improvements to their Healing Arts Hub and build-out of new community space at Shirley Chisholm Village / teacher housing project. (F) $150,000 to the Silver Lake, Echo Park, Los Feliz, Atwater Village, and East Hollywood (SELAH) Neighborhood Homeless Coalition for services for individuals and families experiencing homelessness. (2.5) To be allocated by the Business, Consumer Services, and Housing Agency as follows, $4,000,000 to the Regional Task Force on Homelessness (SDRTFH) to be allocated equally among SDRTFH, the Voices of Our City Choir, and the Monarch School for housing, case management, resource and capacity building. (3) To be allocated by the Office of Planning and Research, Strategic Growth Council, as follows: (A) $10,000,000 for the Jefferson Boulevard Affordable Housing and Park Project. (B) $2,000,000 to the City of San Diego for startup costs for emergency shelter for victims of domestic violence. (C) $1,000,000 to the City of Sacramento to provide navigation, rental assistance, and other services for individuals and families experiencing homelessness in and around the California Capitol State Park. (D) $400,000 to the Family Services Agency of Burbank for services for families experiencing homelessness. (i) HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) To be allocated by the State Department of Health Care Services as follows: (A) $17,200,000 to the County of Los Angeles for the Clínica Monseñor Oscar A. Romero’s Centro Alaxik. (B) $1,500,000 to the County of Ventura for the Westminster Free Clinic. (C) $5,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles for improving health outcomes for San Fernando Valley patients of the North East Valley Health Corporation. (D) $2,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles for the Westside Infant and Family Network. (E) $1,000,000 to the County of Yolo, Department of Health and Human Services, for the Yolo Crisis Nursery. (F) $1,000,000 to the County of Orange for Be Well OC. (2) To be allocated by the State Department of Public Health as follows: (A) $7,800,000 to the County of Los Angeles Department of Public Health for the Via Care’s Cesar Chavez Health Center. (B) $200,000 to the County of Santa Clara for the Santa Clara County Health Equity Agenda. (C) $500,000 to the County of San Diego, District 2 for the purchase of the San Ysidro Health Rural Mobile Unit. (D) $10,000,000 to the County of Kern for Adventist Health AIS Cancer Center, Bakersfield for the Rural Cancer Center Expansion. (E) $15,000,000 for a one-time grant program to strengthen testing for infectious agents in hospital emergency departments, including, but not limited to, HIV, hepatitis C, and syphilis. Funds shall be available for administration and evaluation and technical assistance for the program. Grants to hospitals to strengthen infectious agent testing shall be awarded to cover screening and navigation services to access treatment and prevention in high-volume, mid-volume, and lower-volume emergency departments in both urban and rural areas. (F) $10,000,000 to Cayenne Wellness Center to support education, outreach, mental health, and care-coordinated services for individuals with sickle cell disease. (3) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services as follows: (A) $5,000,000 to the City of Oxnard for the Casa Aliento and Del Playa Inn Homeless Shelters. (B) $5,000,000 for the purchase of the land and construction of a new food bank, administered by Food Share Ventura. (C) $200,000 to the County of Ventura Human Services Agency for the Kids and Families Together to hire a limited term fundraising professional to focus on obtaining funding from corporate, foundation, and faith-based organizations. (D) $2,500,000 for the Rancho Cordova Food Locker to upgrade existing buildings and food storage areas, as well as create a safe, secure, and accessible satellite food distribution center for the unhoused community. (E) $3,000,000 for Project Angel Food: Facility/kitchen Expansion. (F) $1,800,000 to the City of Alameda for the Community Assessment Response and Engagement (CARE) Team. (G) $1,500,000 to Los Angeles Regional Food Bank for the West Valley Food Pantry Community Center Addition. (H) $600,000 to the Karsh Family Social Service Center capital projects. These funds are available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2028. (4) To be allocated by the State Department of Developmental Services as follows: (A) $2,000,000 to the California Policy Center for Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities to develop innovative strategies to support adults with developmental disabilities in employment. (B) $1,000,000 to Easterseals Southern California for autistic care and programs. (5) To be allocated by the State Department of Health Care Services as follows: (A) $2,158,000 to the Luminarias Institute for Mental Health programming. (B) $390,000 to Penny Lane Centers for Substance Use Disorder and Co-occurring Disorder Services. (C) $400,000 to the San Fernando Valley Community Mental Health Services for Mental Health Services. (D) $1,500,000 to the City of Huntington Beach for the Mobile Crisis Response Program. (E) $277,000 to Valley Community Healthcare for training for new providers. (F) $4,000,000 to the Children’s Hospital of Orange County (CHOC) for supporting mental health services. (6) $50,000 to Hands4Hope Los Angeles for the Pandemic Recovery Program. (7) $250,000 to Exceptional Minds for a Job Preparation Programming for people on the autism spectrum. (8) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections, $120,000 to Soledad Enrichment Action for a financial literacy and entrepreneurship program for at-risk youth. (9) $277,000 to Valley Community Healthcare for training for new providers. (10) $2,500,000 to the City of Monterey for the Community Human Services' Shuman Heart House for building renovations, furnishings, and equipment. (11) $3,000,000 to the Inner Circle Children’s Advocacy Center for programming services for abused children. (12) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $10,100,000 to the Jewish Family Service Los Angeles for Holocaust Survivor Assistance. (13) To be allocated by the Department of Public Health, $25,000 to the County of San Mateo for the District Wide: Peninsula Humane Society: X-Ray Machine Upgrade. (14) To be allocated by the State Department of Health Care Services as follows: (A) $100,000 to the County of San Mateo for the District Wide: Planned Parenthood Mar Monte: Purchase of a Hysteroscope for the San Mateo Health Center. (B) $1,000,000 to the City of Fresno for Reproductive Health for the Central Valley: Planned Parenthood Mar Monte health center renovations. (C) $1,000,000 to the City of Buena Park for the KCS Health Center to purchase three mobile health clinics. (D) $3,000,000 for the Los Angeles Kheir Clinic. (E) $6,500,000 to the Richmond Area Multi-Services Inc. (Rams, Inc.) for building acquisition for clinics. (F) $5,000,000 to the County of Modoc for Modoc Hospital Legacy Debt Elimination. (G) $4,000,000 to the Loma Linda University Children's Hospital for the Trauma-Informed Medical Home Model for Victimized Children Capacity. (H) $5,000,000 to the County of Madera to facilitate the reopening of operations at Madera Community Hospital. (15) To be allocated by the State Department of Public Health, $3,000,000 to the City of Martinez for the Feet First Foundation. (16) $5,000,000 to the State Council on Developmental Disabilities for implementation of the Supported Decisionmaking Technical Assistance Program (SDM-TAP), as follows: (A) $2,000,000 for the establishment and operation of the SDM-TAP within the State Council on Developmental Disabilities. (B) $3,000,000 to be awarded in grant funding. (17) $500,000 to be allocated by the California Department of Aging to the County of San Mateo for the Police Interaction with Dementia Patients Pilot. (j) VETERANS (1) To be allocated by the Department of Veterans Affairs as follows: (A) $90,000 to the United Way of San Joaquin County/Woody Williams Foundation designated for the Gold Star Families Memorial Monument at the new San Joaquin County VA Clinic, located at 6505 South Manthey Road, French Camp, California, 95231. Any excess funds for this Gold Star Families Memorial Monument Project will be used to further the mission to honor and serve Gold Star Families and the legacy of their loved ones who have paid the ultimate sacrifice. (B) $2,700,000 to the City of Palmdale Department of Neighborhood Services for the Homes 4 Families Housing Construction in a Veteran Enriched Neighborhood. (C) $200,000 for the City of Elk Grove for the American Legion Post 233 Elk Grove to provide support and services to the community and veterans. (2) $1,000,000 for the Cayucos Veterans Hall Renovations. (k) OTHER COMMUNITY SERVICES (1) $2,000,000 to the County of Santa Clara for the Santa Clara County Youth Climate Initiative in the Office of Sustainability. (2) To be allocated by the California Department of Education, $2,200,000 to the Silicon Valley Education Foundation for Youth programming. (3) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $5,000,000 to Conga Kids for arts and education programming. (4) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $5,200,000 to the Entrepreneur Education, Inc., to support the primary program objectives of the EECI Business Opportunity Center. (5) $500,000 to the San Mateo County Union Community Alliance. (6) $1,000,000 to the City of South San Francisco for the North San Mateo County Economic Advancement Center. (7) To be allocated by the California Department of Aging, $2,100,000 to the City of Bellflower for the Bellflower Youth & Senior Center. (8) $5,200,000 to Angels for Sight for renovating Angels for Sight’s new Long Beach vision care center. (9) To be allocated by the California Department of Aging, $10,000,000 to Choice in Aging for construction costs at the aging in place campus. (10) $5,000,000 to the County of Yolo to support Knight’s Landing Park, Vic Fazio Wildlife Area, Crisis Nursery expansion and the Underserved Farmer’s Cooperative. (11) $250,000 to El Proyecto del Barrio for a Digital Display system. (12) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $1,500,000 to the City of Los Angeles, Office of the City Clerk, for the Watts Empowerment Center to support the planning, design and renovation of the 4-Acre arts and culture campus. (13) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $1,500,000 to the San Bernardino Community Service Center, Inc. for Immigration Services. (14) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $700,000 to the Neighborhood Legal Services of Los Angeles for the research on community-driven equitable development in communities experiencing poverty in the San Fernando Valley. (15) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $2,000,000 to Skirball for refugee services, Spanish translation of materials, and exhibit. (16) To be allocated by the Department of Housing and Community Development, $9,000,000 to ETTA for capital outlay projects. (17) $1,000,000 to the Chicano Latino Youth Leadership Project (CLYLP) for the CLYLP expansion to the Inland Empire. (18) $1,740,000 to the Huerta del Valle Community Garden for Huerta del Valle program support. (19) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $8,500,000 to One OC for programming improvements to serve communities historically underrepresented in business ownership. (20) $5,000,000 to Access California Services for capital costs for a new building. (21) $2,000,000 to La Familia Counseling Services for capital costs of Opportunity Center. (22) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $2,500,000 to the City of Corona for the Renovation of Innovation and Economic Center. (23) $25,000,000 to the City of Alhambra for the construction of the Alhambra community center. (24) $9,000,000 to the City of Santa Ana for the Modernization of the Santa Ana Civic Center (SACC). (25) To be allocated by Board of State and Community Corrections, $500,000 to the County of Sacramento for the Sacramento Regional Family Justice Center. (26) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation: (A) $400,000 for the Dream Play Yard for the Boys & Girls Club of Laguna Beach to address physical, socio-emotional, and academic well-being with more PLAY and learning for local youth. (B) $1,949,950 for the Boys and Girls Club of Huntington Valley for alternative fuel school bus replacement and facility repairs and upgrades. (C) $1,400,000 to the City of Vacaville for the Vacaville Neighborhood Boys and Girls Club land acquisition and capital projects. (D) $1,000,000 to the Boys and Girls Club of Wilmington, Safer Wilmington Initiative. (27) To be allocated by the Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander American Affairs, $1,000,000 to Ben Em Dang Co Ta Foundation for the Anti-Asian Hate Campaign/Project. (28) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $1,000,000 to Gold House for Fighting Anti-AAPI Hate and enabling socioeconomic opportunities. (29) To be allocated by the State Department of Developmental Services, $300,000 to the City of Elk Grove for Project R.I.D.E. (30) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation, $200,000 for the Lakewood Family YMCA Capital Improvements. (31) $3,000,000 to the Marin City Community Services District to remodel the community center. (32) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency, $5,200,000 to the City of Long Beach for the Wrigley Greenbelt restoration and Multi-Service Center expansion and improvements. (33) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $5,000,000 to the City of Signal Hill for the renovation of the Signal Hill outdoor amphitheater. (34) $800,000 to the City of Sacramento for Street Soccer USA Sacramento. (35) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $3,000,000 to the County of Sacramento Department of General Services Mather Community Campus Human Assistance Facility. (36) $2,500,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the Los Angeles Street Car “Grow the Grid” program. (37) $2,000,000 to the City of Sacramento for South Sacramento Youth Programming providing grants to South Sac community-based organizations. (38) $2,000,000 for the City of Fullerton for the Women’s Transitional Living Center to address impact of COVID-19 on Domestic Violence and Human Trafficking Victims. (39) $2,000,000 to the Community Youth Center to complete the Richmond Community Center. (40) $2,200,000 for Camp Fire Angeles Capital Improvements. (41) $2,000,000 to the County of San Mateo for the Pescadero Community Plaza Project. Funding provided in this paragraph is available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2028. (42) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $4,000,000 for the Watts Tower Arts Center Campus Renovation. (43) $3,700,000 to the YMCA of Greater Long Beach for the Los Altos YMCA Renovation and Construction projects. (44) $4,500,000 to the County of San Bernardino for the Bloomington Animal Shelter and enhance services at the new shelter facility by offering onsite veterinary care, administering animal behavior assessments, and expanding its adoption and volunteer programs. (45) $25,000,000 to the City of Riverside for the Cesar Chavez Community Center Renovations. (46) $5,500,000 to the City of Torrance for the Community Resource and Response Center. (47) $5,000,000 to the Community Development Finance, in partnership with the City of Oakland for the Teachers Rooted in Oakland (TRiO) Program. (48) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $3,000,000 for the All in Eats/Food Hub. (49) $3,000,000 to the San Diego LGBT Center for the LGBT Center expansion planning and predevelopment and for housing, case management, resource, and capacity building. (50) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $2,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the development of a County of a San Diego Black Chamber of Commerce. (51) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections, $750,000 to the City of San Diego for Your Safe Place – A Family Justice Center. (52) $10,000,000 to the County of Orange to expedite the completion of an urgently needed Behavioral Health Families and Children’s Campus, which will deliver coordinated mental health services, support, and resources to children and their family members. (53) $19,000,000 to the City of Colton for Community Development Projects. (54) $8,000,000 to the City of Fremont for the Central Park Community Center project. (55) $1,700,000 to the City of San Diego to work with San Diego area schools to support the needs of refugee students. (56) $3,000,000 to InConcert Sierra for renovations to Crown Point Community Center. (57) $250,000 to Levon and Hasmig Tavilian for support, maintenance, computer equipment, and supplies. (58) To be allocated by the Department of Health Care Services, $850,000 to the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments for mobile crisis pilot program. (59) To be allocated by the Department of Public Health, $100,000 for the Burbank Community YMCA for Social Impact Center for programing and support. (60) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $250,000 to BAYMEC Community Foundation for community education, outreach, and services that support the LGBTQ+ community and to preserve and promote the Silicon Valley’s LGBTQ+ history. (61) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services, $1,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles for the Jenesse Center purchase and refurbishment of facility for domestic violence survivors. (62) To be allocated by the Department of Housing and Community Development, $1,000,000 to the City of Burlingame for the Burlingame Plaza project. (63) To be allocated by the Office of Planning and Research, $1,000,000 for the Asian Pacific Youth Leadership Project. (64) To be allocated by the California Department of Aging, $500,000 to the City of Hawthorne for Hawthorne Senior Center infrastructure improvements. (65) To be allocated by the State Department of Health Care Services, $5,000,000 for Chinese Hospital, located in San Francisco. (66) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $3,000,000 for 490 Brannan Kularts Site Acquisition. (67) To be allocated by the California State University, $2,500,000 for San Francisco State Cross Cultural Center. (68) $2,000,000 for United Playaz Youth Center Acquisition. (69) To be allocated by the State Library, $850,000 for the Chinese Historical Society Infrastructure Improvements. (70) $200,000 to the Armenian Bar Association for supporting the increased activity in pro bono tenant relief clinics throughout the County of Los Angeles. (71) $200,000 to Homenetmen Hrashq for supporting services for disabled youth athletes. (72) $350,000 to Ararat Home of Los Angeles campus for the purposes of purchasing a new facility and defraying costs for running the Ararat-Eskijian Museum that is located on the campus. (73) $250,000 to Camp AREV for capital improvements and new facility construction. (74) $1,000,000 for the Vivalon Healthy Aging Campus. (75) $750,000 to AGBY Manoogian-Demirdjian School to assist in capital improvements and classroom reconstruction. (l) GENERAL GOVERNMENT (1) To be allocated by the Department of Technology as follows: (A) $4,000,000 to the City of Gardena for the Digital Divide to design and deploy a fiber corridor to connect residents, small businesses, schools, community facilities, and other broadband capabilities in all of the city’s six parks. (B) $200,000 to the City of Duarte for Broadband Access. (C) $1,800,000 to the City of Newark for Broadband Master Planning. (D) $500,000 to the Town of Danville for a Fiber Optic Interconnected Network for Town Facilities. (2) $20,000,000 to the San Diego Association of Governments (SANDAG) to reduce the outstanding bond balance of the SR-125 Fund to support efforts to eliminate bond debt by 2027. (3) To be allocated by the Exposition Park as follows: (A) $10,000,000 for the California African American Museum. (4) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $500,000 for the Capitol Radio equipment replacement and upgrades. (5) $300,000 to the County of Butte for the Flower Bowl Demolition. (6) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections, $100,000 to the City of Santee for Rise Up Industries. (7) $700,000 to the City of Citrus Heights for the Citrus Heights Gateway Activation Plan (GAP) Project. (8) To be allocated by the California Department of Aging, $1,200,000 for the new Self Help for the Elderly Sunset Senior Center construction costs. (9) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services, $2,500,000 for the County of Madera for Infrastructure. (10) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, as follows: (A) $1,500,000 to the City of Fresno for support of the Neighborhood Industry’s efforts to purchase and renovate their headquarters. (B) $10,000,000 for the California Entrepreneurship Capital in the Community Initiative. (C) $5,000,000 to the County of Contra Costa for the one-time start up funding for the Green Empowerment Zone for the Northern Waterfront Area of Contra Costa County. (11) $5,400,000 to the City of Culver City for Transportation Electrification Infrastructure Electrification. (12) $8,000,000 to the City of Redlands for the construction of their University of Redlands Village. (13) To be allocated by the Department of Justice, $500,000 to the Girl Scouts of San Diego County for background check costs. (14) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $3,000,000 to the County of San Diego for the Partnership for the Advancement of New Americans for permanent Refugee and Cultural Hub building acquisition. (15) $3,300,000 to the City of San Diego for the San Diego Urban Sustainability Coalition for construction of a light industrial office complex in a historically underinvested community. (16) $4,500,000 to the City of Santee for the completion of the new Santee Community Center. (m) LABOR (1) To be allocated by the California Workforce Development Board as follows: (A) $500,000 to the County of San Mateo for the Regional: San Mateo County Union Community Alliance: San Mateo Trades Introduction Program. (B) $3,000,000 to the County of Fresno for the ValleyBuild/Fresno Regional Workforce Development Board. (C) $3,400,000 for Workforce Development and Exploration in Pomona. (D) $10,000,000 for the San Diego Workforce Partnership. (E) $8,000,000 for a grant to the Kern Community College District for the Farmworker Institute of Education & Leadership Development (FIELD) for the acquisition and remodel of a facility to act both as FIELD’s Headquarters and offer workforce development programs, education services, and temporary housing. (F) $2,000,000 to the County of Sacramento Office of Education for academic and extracurricular programs and outdoor learning experiences at Camp Winthers; new Construction/Building Trades pathway. (G) $2,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the Los Angeles Cleantech Incubator (LACI) to expand workforce development and cleantech innovation pilots, and advance zero emission energy solutions in disadvantaged communities. (H) $5,000,000 to the SF Market to support San Francisco's economic and artistic workforce in the Southeastern Corridor neighborhoods of Bayview-Hunters Point. (I) $1,700,000 to The Box Shop to support San Francisco's economic and artistic workforce in the Southeastern Corridor neighborhoods of Bayview-Hunters Point. (J) $750,000 to fund a study and development of model plan for worker wellness centers for transit agencies throughout the state. (2) To be allocated by the Employment Training Panel as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the City of Chino, Chino City Council for the Chino Valley Chamber of Commerce for the Upskill Chino Valley to expand services. SEC. 4. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2022 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2022 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 43 of the Statutes of 2022 (Senate Bill No. 154). (b) Chapter 45 of the Statutes of 2022 (Assembly Bill No. 178). (c) Chapter 249 of the Statutes of 2022 (Assembly Bill No. 179). (d) Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 100). (e) Chapter 33 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 103). (f) Chapter 189 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 104). (g) Chapter 862 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 105). (h) Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 106). (i) Chapter 996 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 158). (j) Chapter 6 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 103). SEC. 5. Item 5227-118-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: 5227-118-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funding appropriated in this item shall be available for competitive grants for district attorneys for the Organized Retail Theft Vertical Prosecution Grant Program for the purpose of addressing increased levels of retail theft property crimes by using a vertical prosecution model. 2. In awarding the funds, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall, at minimum, require the grantee to demonstrate the following requirements on its application for the competitive grant: (a) How the additional funds will meaningfully address the increase in organized retail theft in the jurisdiction and the existing hurdles of implementing a vertical prosecution model in their jurisdiction to prosecute these crimes without this grant. (b) How the funding will be used in facilitating collaboration with online marketplaces and retailers to address the increase in property crimes in the jurisdiction. (c) How the jurisdiction plans to use alternatives to incarceration, including diversion or restorative justice programs, to reduce organized retail theft and help reduce recidivism. (d) How the jurisdiction will be able to sustain this program upon the expiration of this one-time grant funding. 3. The county receiving the competitive grant shall do the following: (a) Employ a vertical prosecution methodology for organized retail theft crimes. (b) Dedicate at least one deputy district attorney and one district attorney investigator whose primary role is the investigation and prosecution of organized retail theft crimes. (c) Provide the Board of State and Community Corrections with annual data on the number of organized retail theft cases filed by that county, the number of organized retail theft convictions obtained, and the sentences imposed for those convicted of organized retail theft in that county. The county shall also provide the number of instances where vertical prosecution was used to obtain those convictions and the sentences imposed. The county shall also provide the number of theft-related property crimes that were charged overall in the jurisdiction that did not use the vertical prosecution model and the resulting number of convictions. 4. On or before January 1, 2027, September 1, 2028, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall submit to the Legislature and the Governor a report relating to the information provided in subdivision (c) of Provision 3, and how the funding was used, and a description of the outcomes of the grant. 5. Funding received by district attorney offices pursuant to this program shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, existing financial resources. 6. Of the amount identified in Schedule (1), up to 5 percent shall be available to the Board of State and Community Corrections for transfer to Schedule (1) of Item 5227-001-0001 for costs to administer the grant program. Funds transferred pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 7. Funds appropriated in Schedule (1) of 5227-118-0001 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. Any unexpended funds identified in Schedule (1) shall revert to the General Fund after that time. SEC. 6. Section 19.561 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: SEC. 19.561. (a) (1) The amounts appropriated pursuant to this section reflect legislative priorities related to natural resources and environmental protection. (2) For allocations in this section that include a designated state entity, the entity shall allocate the funds to the recipients identified in the paragraphs following each designation. The state entity shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this section. Self-attestation by the receiving entity is an acceptable method of verification of the use of funds, if determined appropriate by the state entity. (3) Notwithstanding any other law, allocations pursuant to this section are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code. (4) If an item number for the appropriate department for a state entity does not exist, and such an item number is required in order to make the specified allocations, the Department of Finance may create an item number for this purpose. (5) Notwithstanding any other law, a designated state entity administering an allocation pursuant to this section may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment, and the allocation may be used to pay for costs incurred prior to the effective date of the act adding this paragraph. (6) The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of allocating authority to a different state entity to facilitate the expenditure of the funds for the intended legislative purpose. Any state entity that allocates funds may also, in consultation with the Department of Finance, use an alternative local fiscal agent that is not identified in this section instead of the fiscal agent designated in this section if necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. Any change to the allocating state entity or fiscal agent made pursuant to this paragraph shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing at least 30 days, or no sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine, prior to the change. It is the intent of the Legislature to revise this section during the 2023–24 fiscal year to reflect any changes necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. (7) Unless otherwise specified in this section, funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2025, and expenditure until June 30, 2027. (8) Unless otherwise specified, the funds appropriated in this section shall not be disbursed for any project prior to September 30, 2023. Future legislation may, but is not required to, specify further details concerning the manner of disbursement of these funds. (9) Funding provided in this section shall not be used for a purpose subject to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. If the Department of Finance determines that any allocation would be considered an appropriation for that purpose, the funding shall not be allocated, and the department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of that finding. (10) The amounts specified in subdivisions (b) through (j), inclusive, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund as follows: (b) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (1) $400,000 to the City of Modesto, for the Awesome Spot Playground. (2) $3,500,000 to the City of San Diego, for the Memorial Community Park Sports Field Lighting Project. (3) $500,000 to the City of Delano, for the City of Delano Parks Rejuvenation. (4) $300,000 to the Buttonwillow Recreation and Park District, for the Buttonwillow Recreation and Park District. (5) $2,000,000 to the City of Bakersfield, for the MLK Jr. Park Rehabilitation Project. (6) $1,000,000 for the Mt. Diablo State Park, Mitchell Canyon Entrance, for the Education Center. (7) $1,500,000 to the Orinda Union School District, for the Conservation of Wagner Ranch Nature Area, Orinda Union School District. (8) $750,000 to the City of Ojai, for the City of Ojai: Construction of Sarzotti Park infrastructure. (9) $500,000 to the City of Del Mar, for the Sand Replenishment Project. (10) $2,000,000 to the Rancho Coastal Humane Society, for the Rancho Coastal Humane Society Expansion and Reconstruction Project. (11) $600,000 to the Port of San Diego and City of Carlsbad, for the EV and Portable Solar Powered Charging Stations Installation. (12) $250,000 to the City of San Diego, for the Lifeguard Northern Garage Feasibility Study. (13) $500,000 to the City of Adelanto, for Bellflower Park. (14) $260,000 to the City of Palmdale, for the 47th St. and Ave. R-4 Pocket Park. (15) $1,500,000 to the Los Angeles Regional Open Space and Affordable Housing (LA ROSAH) Collaborative, for the Taylor Yard Equity Strategy at the Los Angeles River. (16) $1,000,000 to the County of Marin, for the Golden Gate Village Playground Upgrades. (17) $500,000 to the City of El Monte, for the City of El Monte Pioneer Park. (18) $35,000 to the City of San Gabriel, for La Casa de San Gabriel Community Center. (19) $100,000 to the City of Burbank, for the Burbank Youth Center Renovation. (20) $1,500,000 to the City of Burbank, for the McCambridge Swimming Pool Renovation. (21) $933,000 to the City of Glendale, for the Fremont Park Renovation. (22) $933,000 to Discovery Cube LA, for the STEM Walk and Ride Trails Project. (23) $1,000,000 to the City of Santa Maria, for the Santa Maria Sports Complex. (24) $425,000 to the City of Buellton, for the City of Buellton Santa Ynez Regional Trail. (25) $750,000 to the City of Goleta, for the City of Goleta Stow Grove Park Playground. (26) $425,000 to the City of Folsom Parks & Recreation Department, for the Johnny Cash Trail Art Experience Master Plan – Cash’s Pick No. 2. (27) $2,000,000 to the Rancho Simi Recreation and Park District, for the Rancho Simi Community Pool Renovation. (28) $500,000 to the Moorpark College Foundation, for the Moorpark Amphitheater. (29) $500,000 to the Rancho Los Cerritos and Rancho Los Alamitos, for deferred maintenance and capital projects. (30) $750,000 to the City of Tustin, for the City of Tustin Legacy Park Improvements. (31) $5,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles, California Community Foundation, to support programs and planning for the benefit of the Southeast Los Angeles County community in preparation for the SELA Cultural Arts Center development. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Budget Act of 2026, these funds are available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2030. (32) $2,700,000 to the City of South Gate, for the City of South Gate capital outlay. (33) $2,700,000 to the City of Lakewood, for the City of Lakewood capital outlay. (34) $2,700,000 to the City of Bellflower, for the City of Bellflower capital outlay. (35) $1,850,000 to the City of Lynwood, for the City of Lynwood capital outlay. (36) $1,850,000 to the City of Huntington Park, for the City of Huntington Park capital outlay. (37) $1,850,000 to the City of Paramount, for the City of Paramount capital outlay. (38) $750,000 to the City of Maywood, for the City of Maywood capital outlay. (39) $600,000 to the County of Los Angeles, for the unincorporated community of Walnut Park capital outlay. (40) $1,000,000 to the City of Fountain Valley, for the Fountain Valley Universally Accessible Playground. (41) $1,000,000 for the Angel Island Immigration Station Foundation. (42) $3,000,000 to the City of San Pablo, for the San Pablo Area for Recreation and Community Space (SPARC) Project. (43) $500,000 to the East Bay Regional Park District, for the Restoration of Wildcat Creek at Brooks Road. (44) $2,000,000 for the City of Gardena for renovation of the Mas Fukai Park building structure. (45) $3,200,000 for the City of La Puente for construction of the La Puente Activity Center and recreation facilities. (46) $6,400,000 for the City of Santa Fe Springs for renovation of the Regional Aquatics Center building. (47) $660,000 for the City of Diamond Bar for playground, restroom, and site improvements at the Maple Hill Park. (48) $1,000,000 for the City of Sacramento for park and community improvement projects. (49) $1,000,000 for the City of Elk Grove for community improvements. (50) $1,000,000 for the City of San Diego for support of the La Jolla Streetscape Project. (51) $1,300,000 for the San Dieguito River Park Joint Powers Authority for the Reach the Beach Trail and Western Gateway Project. (52) $150,000 for Street Soccer USA for restrooms. (53) $100,000 for the County of San Diego for support of the Pillars of the Community garden and gathering space. (54) $300,000 for the City of Millbrae for capital improvements to the Bayside Manor and Marina Vista Parks. (55) $500,000 for the County of San Mateo for creation of Ohlone State Historic Trail Markers. (56) $1,400,000 for San Dieguito River Park Joint Powers Authority for completion of the Asuna Segment of the Coast to Crest Trail. (57) $3,000,000 for the City of Gardena for the Rowley Park Gymnasium Renovation. (58) $400,000 for the Soledad Mission Recreation District for deferred maintenance and updating systems. (59) $1,000,000 for the City of Parlier for Indoor/Outdoor Regional Sports Park. (60) $1,000,000 for the City of Kerman for the completion of the Hart Ranch Community Park project. (61) $350,000 for the City of Reedley for additional playing fields at the City’s Sports Complex. (62) $500,000 for the City of Madera for trail system upgrades for the Lions Town and Country Park. (63) $310,000 for the County of Merced for a community park in Santa Nella. (64) $1,250,000 for Sonoma County Regional Parks for the Larson Park Renovation project and wildfire mitigation in Sonoma Valley. (65) $1,000,000 for the Heart of Los Angeles (HOLA) for support of a Placemaking Initiative at Lafayette Park. (66) $5,000,000 for the East Bay Regional Park District for improvements to Roddy Ranch. (67) $2,000,000 for the City of Paramount for support for the West Santa Ana Branch Bikeway Project Trail. (68) (a) $1,000,000 for the City of Santa Paula for improvements to the Santa Paula Creek Sports Park. (b) $1,000,000 for the County of Ventura for the Teen Center at Saticoy Park. (69) $1,500,000 for the Great Redwood Trail Agency (GRTA) for trail construction, community outreach, and pre-trail development activities. (70) $2,000,000 for the Pacific Symphony Education and Community Enrichment Programs for expansion of music programs serving vulnerable communities. (71) $300,000 for the City of Laguna Beach for the construction of a dog play area at Moulton Meadows Park. (72) $350,000 for the City of Huntington Beach to support the Huntington Beach Ride Circuit Shuttle Program. (73) $1,225,000 for the City of Laguna Beach for the rehabilitation of the Moss Street Beach Access. (74) $1,000,000 for the Play Equity Fund for design and development of park, recreation, and open space improvements on county owned land adjacent to Yvonne Braithwaite Burke Sports Complex. (75) $2,000,000 for the City of La Habra for the Vista Grande park development project. (76) $2,000,000 for the Hesperia Recreation and Park District for relocation and construction of a modernized corporation yard facility. (77) $400,000 for the City of Los Angeles for the development of an equestrian trail master plan in Northeast San Fernando Valley. (78) $500,000 to the County of Ventura, for the development of the Meiners Oaks park. (c) To be allocated by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery as follows: (1) $240,000 to the City of Adelanto, for the Tire Collection Bounty Program. (d) To be allocated by the State Air Resources Board as follows: (1) $500,000 to the Safe Passage Youth Foundation, for the Disadvantaged Community Electric Vehicle Pilot Project. (2) $250,000 to the City of La Mesa, for the City of La Mesa Lemon Avenue Public Parking Lot Electric Vehicle Charging Stations. (3) $400,000 to the City of La Mesa, for the La Mesa Public Works Yard Solar Panel and Battery Storage Project. (e) To be allocated by the Department of Food and Agriculture as follows: (1) $500,000 to the City of Sacramento, for the Meadowview Community Farmers Market. (2) $2,123,000 to the Community Alliance with Family Farmers, for the Community Alliance with Family Farmers Emergency Funding. (3) $314,000 to the Penny Lane Centers, for the Penny Lane Centers/Abbey Road - Affordable Housing Renovation for Transition Age Youth. (f) To be allocated by the California Energy Commission as follows: (1) $700,000 to the City of El Segundo, for EV Charging Stations. (2) $1,000,000 to the City of Daly City Department of Public Works, for the Daly City Energy Storage. (g) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency as follows: (1) $1,000,000 to the City of Capitola, for the Community Center Renovation. (2) $780,000 to the Natural Resources Agency, Blue Ribbon Committee for Rehabilitation of Clear Lake, for the Water Quality Evaluations, Data Management, and Groundwater Evaluations for the Rehabilitation of Clear Lake. (3) $1,100,000 to the University of California, Davis Tahoe Environmental Research Center (TERC), for the Hypolimnetic Oxygenation Pilot Project to Revitalize Clear Lake. (4) $2,000,000 to the City of Fresno, for the Radio Bilingue: Building of a new public radio headquarters and programming. (5) $1,500,000 to the County of Ventura, for the Ventura County Pet Shelter. (6) $500,000 to the City of Campbell, for the City of Campbell: ADA Facility Improvements. (7) $1,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles, Department of Parks and Recreation, for the Puente Hills Landfill Park. (8) $1,000,000 to the City of Pico Rivera, for the City of Pico Rivera’s First Dog Park. (9) $250,000 to the City of Walnut, for the Snow Creek Park. (10) $250,000 to the City of Diamond Bar, for the Heritage Park. (11) $250,000 to the YMCA of Greater Whittier Uptown Family Center, for the YMCA of Greater Whittier Uptown Family Center. (12) $1,000,000 to the City of Palmdale, for the Facility for Salva. (13) $3,063,000 to the County of Riverside, for TruEvolution for the launch of the Inland Empire LGBTQ Resource Center and grant initiatives, including services in southwest Riverside County, including Menifee, Lake Elsinore, and Norco. (14) $250,000 to the City of Vista, for the AVO Playhouse Rehabilitation & ADA Upgrades Project. (15) $1,200,000 to the YMCA of Metropolitan Los Angeles, for Community Empowerment Hubs at the Mid Valley YMCA and the West Valley YMCA. (16) $500,000 to CounterPulse. (17) $500,000 for the Central American Resource Center (CARECEN-SF) New 1117 Market St. Community Center Site. (18) $2,000,000 to the City of Monrovia, for the Restoration of Monrovia Canyon Park. (19) $1,500,000 to the City of La Verne, for upgrades to Las Flores Park. (20) $2,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles, for the renovation of two Armenian Youth Federation camps. (21) $800,000 to Heal the Bay, for the Pacific Palisades Creek Daylight Storm Water Restoration Project. (22) $1,500,000 to the City of San Jose, for the Lake Cunningham Water Quality and Shoreline Improvements. (23) $1,000,000 to the City of Newark, for the Newark Resource Center. (24) $1,000,000 to the City of Fremont, for the Multi-Service Community Center at Central Park. (25) $2,000,000 to the City of Avalon, for the Cabrillo Mole Phase II. (26) $5,000,000 to the City of Sacramento, for various Community Reinvestment projects. (27) $1,350,000 to the City of Sacramento, for Aging Infrastructure (Grass fields at Garcia Bend Park). (28) $2,718,000 to the City of Downey, for the Columbia Memorial Space Center 2nd Building Expansion. (29) $374,050 to the City of San Mateo, for the Bayside Manor and Marina Vista Park Upgrades. (30) $500,000 to the City of Rocklin, for the City of Rocklin Sunset Whitney Connector Bridge. (31) $1,200,000 to the City of Artesia Park, for Facility Improvements/Community Center Roofing. (32) $2,000,000 to the City of Artesia, for the Artesia Botanical Gardens and Educational Feature. (33) $5,000,000 to the City of San Bernardino, for capital improvements. (34) $3,200,000 to the City of Rancho Cucamonga, for the First Responders 9/11 Memorial. (35) $2,000,000 to the City of Redlands, for the Museum of Redlands Construction Completion. (36) $3,000,000 to the City of Fontana, for the Fontana Downtown Plan. (37) $1,924,000 to the Fairplex, for the Career and Technical Education Center. (38) $3,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the Casa 0101. (39) $500,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the Chinatown Service Center. (40) $171,000 to the Community Integration Services, Inc., for the Community Integration Services, Inc. Infrastructure and Technology Upgrades. (41) $279,000 to the SRD Straightening Reins, for the SRD - Straightening Reins: Solar Panels & Extreme Heat Protection Roof. (42) $160,000 to the Santa Clarita Valley Boys & Girls Club, for the Santa Clarita Valley Boys & Girls Club Infrastructure Upgrades. (43) $1,100,000 to the City of Madera, for the City of Madera – Lions Town & Country Park. (44) $8,000,000 to the County of Fresno, for the City of Mendota Community Center. (45) $3,500,000 to the County of Merced, for the Franklin-Beachwood Public Park. (46) $3,100,000 to the City of Stockton, for the City of Stockton – Redevelopment on the Miracle Mile: Public Safety/Maintenance Substation/Parking. (47) $2,500,000 to the City of San Diego, for the San Diego River Park Foundation. (48) $195,000 to the City of San Diego, for the City of San Diego “The Black Family” Statue Restoration Project. (49) $1,500,000 to the City of Vallejo, for the Vallejo Marina Seawall Rehabilitation Project. (50) $250,000 to the Anderson Valley Community Services District, for the Anderson Valley Skate Park. (51) $1,250,000 to the Dr. Huey P. Newton Center for Research & Action, for the Dr. Huey P. Newton Center for Research & Action (Black Panther Party). (52) $500,000 for the City of San Diego for Balboa Park Spreckels Organ Project. (53) $5,600,000 for the City of San Diego/Fleet Science Center for Fleet Center exhibit space. (54) $200,000 for the City of Los Altos for infrastructure upgrades for greening and electrifying downtown Los Altos. (55) $5,000,000 for the San Joaquin Community Foundation for establishment of an urban forest program. (56) $1,000,000 for the City of Santa Cruz for support of repairs and improvements to the West Cliff coastal recreation corridor. (57) $150,000 for the Center for Coastal Marine Sciences for baseline assessment of the Morro Bay Wind Energy Area’s biological wildlife and ecosystem conditions. (58) $750,000 for the County of San Luis Obispo for support of staffing resources for offshore wind development. (59) $500,000 for the Santa Barbara Land Trust for acquisition, restoration, and ongoing improvements of the Gaviota Overlook in the Arroyo Hondo Preserve. (60) $500,000 for Heal the Oceans to conduct a geological study in Summerland, California. (61) $1,625,000 for the Santa Barbara Community Environmental Council for the support of the Santa Barbara County Regional Climate Collaborative. (62) $503,000 for the Nickels Soil Lab for the support of lab operations. (63) $2,500,000 for the City of Los Alamitos for infrastructure repairs and improvements. (64) $200,000 to Calaveras County Animal Services for facilities improvements. (65) $1,000,000 for the City of San Diego for facility upgrades of the World Beat Center in Balboa Park. (h) To be allocated by Exposition Park as follows: (1) $500,000, for the Renovation of Al Malaikah Shrine Auditorium. (2) $1,000,000 to the California Science Center Foundation, for the California Science Center Foundation Air and Space Center. (i) To be allocated by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection as follows: (1) $1,250,000 for the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for an Urban Forestry in Schools Grant Program. (j) To be allocated by the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy as follows: (1) $6,500,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for acquisition and conservation of publicly accessible parkland in Calabasas and unincorporated Topanga. (2) $2,500,000 for the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for support of planning, scoping, and investment in the Sepulveda Basin. SEC. 7. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2023 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 12 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 101). (b) Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 102). (c) Chapter 189 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 104). (d) Chapter 862 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 105). (e) Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 106). (f) Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 109). (g) Chapter 996 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 158). (h) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 100). (i) Chapter 6 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 103). (j) Chapter 104 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 105). (k) Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2026 (Assembly Bill No. 107). SEC. 8. Item 5227-118-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 5227-118-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 6,400,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 6,400,000 Provisions: 1. The funding appropriated in this item shall be available for competitive grants for district attorneys for the Organized Retail Theft Vertical Prosecution Grant Program for the purpose of addressing increased levels of retail theft property crimes by using a vertical prosecution model. 2. In awarding the funds, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall, at minimum, require the grantee to demonstrate the following requirements on its application for the competitive grant: (a) How the additional funds will meaningfully address the increase in organized retail theft in the jurisdiction and the existing hurdles of implementing a vertical prosecution model in their jurisdiction to prosecute these crimes without this grant. (b) How the funding will be used in facilitating collaboration with online marketplaces and retailers to address the increase in property crimes in the jurisdiction. (c) How the jurisdiction plans to use alternatives to incarceration, including diversion or restorative justice programs, to reduce organized retail theft and help reduce recidivism. (d) How the jurisdiction will be able to sustain this program upon the expiration of this one-time grant funding. 3. The county receiving the competitive grant shall do the following: (a) Employ a vertical prosecution methodology for organized retail theft crimes. (b) Dedicate at least one deputy district attorney and one district attorney investigator whose primary role is the investigation and prosecution of organized retail theft crimes. (c) Provide the Board of State and Community Corrections with annual data on the number of organized retail theft cases filed by that county, the number of organized retail theft convictions obtained, and the sentences imposed for those convicted of organized retail theft in that county. The county shall also provide the number of instances where vertical prosecution was used to obtain those convictions and the sentences imposed. The county shall also provide the number of theft-related property crimes that were charged overall in the jurisdiction that did not use the vertical prosecution model and the resulting number of convictions. 4. On or before January 1, 2027, September 1, 2028, the Board of State and Community Corrections shall submit to the Legislature and the Governor a report relating to the information provided in subdivision (c) of Provision 3, and how the funding was used, and a description of the outcomes of the grant. 5. Funding received by district attorney offices pursuant to this program shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, existing financial resources. 6. Of the amount identified in Schedule (1), up to 5 percent shall be available to the Board of State and Community Corrections for transfer to Schedule (1) of Item 5227-001-0001 for costs to administer the grant program. Funds transferred pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 7. Funds appropriated in Schedule (1) of 5227-118-0001 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. Any unexpended funds identified in Schedule (1) shall revert to the General Fund after that time. SEC. 9. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2024 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 22 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 107). (b) Chapter 35 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 108). (c) Chapter 994 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 157). (d) Chapter 995 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 180). (e) Chapter 1 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Assembly Bill No. 4). (f) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 3). (g) Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 1). (h) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 2). (i) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 100). (j) Chapter 6 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 103). (k) Chapter 104 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 105). (l) Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2026 (Assembly Bill No. 107). SEC. 10. Item 0840-001-6094 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0840-001-6094—For support of the Controller, payable from the 2024 State School Facilities Fund ........................ 300,000384,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 300,000384,000 SEC. 11. Item 2240-494 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 2240-494—Reappropriation, Department of Housing and Community Development. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $8,000,000 appropriated in Schedule 3, Item 2240-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). SEC. 12. Item 2660-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 2660-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of Transportation ........................ 9,000,000 Schedule: (1) 1835020-Local Assistance ........................ 9,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 shall be available to the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District for freight rail operations and capital, and deferred maintenance. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to Sonoma County for the Geyserville ADA Sidewalk and Street Project. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 shall be available to the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District for North County Rail and Great Redwood Trail planning and development. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to Kern County for the Meadows Field Airport rehabilitation and taxiway widening construction. rehabilitation, airport parking infrastructure, and other airport infrastructure improvements. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, a designated state entity administering an allocation pursuant to this item may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment, and the allocation may be used to pay for costs incurred prior to the effective date of the act adding this provision. 6. Each allocation in this item includes a designated state entity that shall allocate the funds to the recipients identified in the applicable provision. The state entity shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this item. Self-attestation by the receiving entity is an acceptable method of verification of the use of funds, if determined appropriate by the state entity. SEC. 13. Item 2720-001-0044 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 2720-001-0044—For support of Department of the California Highway Patrol, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 3,059,616,0003,075,316,000 Schedule: (1) 2050-Traffic Management ........................ 2,905,798,0002,921,498,000 (2) 2055-Regulation and Inspection ........................ 245,196,000 (3) 2060-Vehicle Ownership Security ........................ 76,393,000 (4) 9900100-Administration ........................ 306,483,000 (5) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −306,483,000 (6) Reimbursements to 2050-Traffic Management ........................ −160,862,000 (7) Reimbursements to 2055-Regulation and Inspection ........................ −3,295,000 (8) Reimbursements to 2060-Vehicle Ownership Security ........................ −3,614,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $7,000,000 may be directed to increase the Department of the California Highway Patrol’s support for police and sheriffs engaged in antigang activities. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $20,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, to fund maintenance and parts for existing vehicles and purchases of replacement vehicles as described in the Department of the California Highway Patrol’s approved annual fleet acquisition plan. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $8,000,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, to fund maintenance and parts for existing aircraft and purchases of replacement aircraft. SEC. 14. Item 2740-004-0044 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 2740-004-0044—For support of Department of Motor Vehicles, payable from the Motor Vehicle Account, State Transportation Fund ........................ 10,001,000 Schedule: (1) 2135-Driver Licensing and Personal Identification ........................ 10,001,000 (2) 9900100-Administration ........................ 830,000 (3) 9900200-Administration— Distributed ........................ −830,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, the Department of Motor Vehicles may use resources to design and develop the State-to-State Verification System. Expenditure authority under this provision includes information technology planning and project costs to build an IT solution to meet federal REAL ID compliance requirements. The system shall not be activated for the purpose of transmitting or sharing data unless specifically authorized by statute prior to July 1, 3, 2026. SEC. 15. Item 3480-491 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3480-491—Reappropriation, Department of Conservation. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended until June 30, 2027: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $38,000,000 of the amount appropriated in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (e) of Section 35 of Chapter 574 of the Statutes of 2022. SEC. 16. Item 3480-492 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3480-492—Reappropriation, Department of Conservation. The amounts specified Unless otherwise specified, the balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure, as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $997,000 of the amount transferred by Executive Order E 22/23 - 102 pursuant to Provision 3 of Item 3480-101-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) until June 30, 2026. (2) Up to $210,000 of the amount transferred by Executive Order E 22/23 - 103 pursuant to Provision 4 of Item 3480-103-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) until June 30, 2027. (3) Up to $50,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3480-103-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) until June 30, 2027. SEC. 17. Item 3560-001-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3560-001-6093—For support of State Lands Commission, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2565-Land Management ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for the purposes of the Hollister Ranch Public Access Plan, including public access improvements at Hollister Ranch. Of this amount, $5,000,000 is available immediately for a pilot program to inform the final environmental impact statement. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 18. Item 3560-101-6093 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is repealed. 3560-101-6093—For local assistance, State Lands Commission, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund 20,000,000Schedule:(1)2565-Land Management20,000,000Provisions:1.The funds appropriated in this item are available for the purposes of the Hollister Ranch Public Access Plan, including public access improvements at Hollister Ranch. Of this amount, $5,000,000 is available immediately for a pilot program to inform the final Environmental Impact Statement.2.The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 19. Item 3600-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3600-001-0001—For support of Department of Fish and Wildlife ........................ 163,304,000165,204,000 Schedule: (1) 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ 157,410,000159,310,000 (2) 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ 15,411,000 (3) 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ 14,702,000 (4) 2605-Enforcement ........................ 42,879,000 (5) 2610-Communications, Education and Outreach ........................ 415,000 (6) 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ 3,761,000 (7) 2620-Fish and Game Commission ........................ 887,000 (8) 9900100-Administration ........................ 66,519,000 (9) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −66,519,000 (10) Reimbursements to 2590-Biodiversity Conservation Program ........................ −50,744,000 (11) Reimbursements to 2595-Hunting, Fishing, and Public Use Program ........................ −3,003,000 (12) Reimbursements to 2600-Management of Department Lands and Facilities ........................ −10,626,000 (13) Reimbursements to 2605-Enforcement ........................ −4,247,000 (14) Reimbursements to 2610-Communications, Education and Outreach ........................ −121,000 (15) Reimbursements to 2615-Spill Prevention and Response ........................ −3,420,000 Provisions: 1. Upon approval of the Director of Finance, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred between schedules. 2. By October 1 of each year, beginning in 2021 and ending in 2026, the department shall submit to the fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office a report summarizing outcomes of its Cutting the Green Tape Initiative. The report shall include information related to the results of this initiative, beginning with the baseline year of 2020–21 and for each fiscal year thereafter, including: (1) a list and description of the projects initiated, (2) average permit processing times, (3) the number of permits granted, (4) specific strategies and changes implemented as part of the initiative, (5) lessons learned to improve ongoing permitting processes and restoration work, and (6) counties and watersheds in which the department has focused related efforts. SEC. 20. Item 4260-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4260-101-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, California Medical Assistance Program, payable from the Health Care Deposit Fund after transfer from the General Fund ........................ 44,054,804,00048,275,339,000 Schedule: (1) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 1,351,167,000 (2) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 45,747,773,00049,968,308,000 (3) Reimbursements to 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ −49,311,000 (4) Reimbursements to 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ −2,994,825,000 Provisions: 1. The aggregate principal amount of disproportionate share hospital general obligation debt that may be issued in the current fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14085.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be $0. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, both the federal and nonfederal shares of any moneys recovered for previously paid health care services, provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, are hereby appropriated and shall be expended as soon as practicable for medical care and services as defined in the Welfare and Institutions Code. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, accounts receivable for recoveries as described in Provision 2 shall have no effect upon the positive balance of the General Fund or the Health Care Deposit Fund. Notwithstanding any other law, moneys recovered as described in this item that are required to be transferred from the Health Care Deposit Fund to the General Fund shall be credited by the Controller to the General Fund without regard to the appropriation from which it was drawn. 4. Without regard to fiscal year, the General Fund shall make one or more loans available not to exceed a cumulative total of $1,000,000,000 to be transferred as needed to the Health Care Deposit Fund to meet cash needs. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient revenue or reimbursements have been collected to meet immediate cash needs and in installments as revenue or reimbursements accumulate if the loan is outstanding for more than one year. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Health Care Services may give public notice relative to proposing or amending any rule or regulation or administrative directive that could result in increased costs in the Medi-Cal program only after approval by the Department of Finance. Additionally, any rule or regulation adopted by the State Department of Health Care Services and any communication that increases costs in the Medi-Cal program shall be effective only after the date upon which it is approved by the Department of Finance. 6. Change orders to the medical or the dental fiscal intermediary contract for amounts exceeding a total cost of $250,000 shall be approved by the Department of Finance not sooner than 30 days after written notification of the change order is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal and policy committees in each house of the Legislature and to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification as the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. The semiannual estimates of Medi-Cal expenditures provided to the Legislature in January and May may constitute the notification required by this provision. 7. Recoveries of advances made to counties in prior years pursuant to Section 14153 of the Welfare and Institutions Code are reappropriated to the Health Care Deposit Fund for reimbursement of those counties where allowable costs exceeded the amounts advanced. Recoveries in excess of the amounts required to fully reimburse allowable costs shall be transferred to the General Fund. When a projected deficiency exists in the California Medical Assistance Program, these funds, subject to notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, are appropriated and shall be expended as soon as practicable for the state’s share of payments for medical care and services and county and other local assistance administration. 8. The Department of Finance may transfer funds representing all or any portion of any estimated savings that are a result of improvements in the Medi-Cal claims processing procedures from the Medi-Cal services budget or the support budget of the State Department of Health Care Services (Item 4260-001-0001) to the fiscal intermediary budget item for purposes of making improvements to the Medi-Cal claims system. 9. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between schedules within this item and between this item and Items 4260-102-0001, 4260-111-0001, 4260-114-0001, and 4260-117-0001 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance may revise reimbursement authority in this item in order to effectively administer the programs funded in those items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or for which funds are being reduced. 10. If a federal grant that provides 75 percent federal financial participation to allow individuals in nursing homes to voluntarily move into a community setting and still receive the same amount of funding for services is awarded to the State Department of Health Care Services during the current fiscal year, then, notwithstanding any other law, the department may count expenditures from the appropriation made to this item as state matching funds for that grant. 11. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize an increase to this appropriation to address costs resulting from adverse court rulings. The Department of Finance shall provide a 30-day notice of any proposed increase to the Legislature. The notification shall include the specifics of any cases with adverse rulings and the overall fiscal impact. Submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be considered meeting the notification requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 12. To the extent practicable and consistent with existing procedures, the State Department of Health Care Services, in its sole discretion, shall seek favorable terms from the federal government regarding the repayment of federal funds for state-only populations in order to minimize the annual impact on the General Fund in any individual fiscal year. 16. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may adjust amounts in this item, Item 4260-111-0001, or any other related item resulting from the State Department of Health Care Services obtaining federal approval to claim federal financial participation for expenditures associated with Designated State Health Programs as part of the CalAIM Demonstration. Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Department of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be considered meeting the reporting requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 17. (a) The nonfederal share amounts received by the department as monetary sanctions collected in the 2024–25 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 14197.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (q) of Section 14197.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, be deposited into the General Fund. (b) This item shall be augmented by the amount deposited into the General Fund pursuant to subprovision (a), which shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026, for the department to award grants to qualifying, nonprofit legal aid programs and organizations that serve Medi-Cal managed care enrollees in the County of Los Angeles or other impacted counties, as necessary. (c) The department shall determine the eligibility criteria, methodology, and distribution of funds appropriated in this provision. (d) The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for purposes of implementing this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and from the State Administrative and State Contracting manuals, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 19. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $10,000,000 is available for the Hearing Aid Coverage for Children Program for the purpose of providing medically necessary hearing aids and related services to eligible persons as described in subprovision (b). (b) A person is eligible for the program described in this provision if they meet all of the following criteria: (1) (A) The person is under 18 years of age; or (B) effective January 1, 2023, the person is under 21 years of age. (2) The person’s household income does not exceed 600 percent of the federal poverty level. (3) The person is not eligible for the Medi-Cal program or the California Children’s Services Program. (4) The person does not have health insurance coverage for hearing aids. (c) For purposes of paragraph (4) of subprovision (b), a person is deemed to have no health insurance coverage if any of the following apply: (1) The person has no health insurance coverage. (2) The person has health insurance coverage that excludes coverage for hearing aids. (3) Effective January 1, 2023, the person has health insurance coverage that has a coverage limit of $1,500 or less for hearing aids. (d) The State Department of Health Care Services shall specify the benefits and services provided to eligible persons under the program described in this provision. This shall include hearing aids, including bone conduction devices, when medically necessary. (e) The State Department of Health Care Services shall develop processes to ensure, to the extent practicable, health insurance coverage for hearing aids and related services covered pursuant to this provision is used before the Hearing Aid Coverage for Children Program is billed. (f) The State Department of Health Care Services may contract with public and private entities in order to implement this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14600) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the State Department of General Services. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletin or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. 20. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (2), $12,130,000 is available for encumbrance or expenditure for the State Department of Health Care Services to support the urgent needs and emergent issues of children and youth, including wellbeing and mindfulness programs, peer-to-peer programs, and the development of a video series to provide parents with resources and skills to support their children’s mental health and to develop next generation digital supports for remote mental health assessment and intervention as a component of the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative. 21. (a) The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid, non-bid, or negotiated basis with a drug rebate aggregator or another entity that provides rebate aggregation services to consolidate and manage drug rebate negotiation, invoicing, collection, dispute resolution, and other related activities with manufacturers, distributors, dispensers, or suppliers of single-source and multiple source drugs, appliances, durable medical equipment, medical supplies, and other product type health care services. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual and the State Administrative Manual and shall be exempt the from review or approval of any division of the State Department of General Services. (b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action. 22. Notwithstanding Section 16531.1 of the Government Code, the General Fund cash loans made to the Medical Providers Interim Payment Fund in fiscal years 2024–25 and 2025–26 are available over the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years for programs funded within this item. No later than June 30, 2034, an allocation from the General Fund shall be made to recognize for budgetary financial reporting the cost of the loans made to the Medical Providers Interim Payment Fund in the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years. The Director of Finance may order the repayment of all or a portion of the loans sooner if the Department of Finance, in consultation with the Department of Health Care Services, determines that the funds appropriated in this item exceed the required costs for programs funded within the item. 24. (a) Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (2), $15,000,000 shall be made available for Title X family planning funding to maintain and support the delivery of equitable, affordable, high quality, client-centered family planning services to eligible patients with low-incomes across the state. (b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall receive and provide the funds to Essential Access Health, the designated statewide federal Title X grantee, no later than September 30, 2025. (c) Funding provided to Essential Access Health may be used for the following purposes: (1) Funding administration and distribution to current members of the 2024–25 statewide federal Title X provider network to prevent any disruption in the delivery of family planning and related services during the 2025–2026 state fiscal year. (2) Technical assistance, training, and other capacity-building support for subrecipients to ensure quality of care. (3) Provider network meetings. (4) Linking community members to family planning services provided by subrecipients. (5) Data collection and evaluation. (6) Drafting and submission of a final report under subprovision (d). (d) Essential Access Health shall prepare and submit a report of expenditures, numbers of patient served, and other information that aligns with Title X Family Planning Annual Report requirements and guidelines, to the State Department of Health Care Services no later than September 30, 2026. (e) The State Department of Health Care Services shall submit the report to the Legislature no later than October 1, 2026. (f) Eighty-five percent of funding shall be distributed to current members of the 2024–25 statewide Title X provider network that includes federally qualified health centers, city and county health departments, Urban Indian Health Centers, universities, hospitals, Planned Parenthood affiliates, and other stand-alone family planning and women’s health centers, and to fund activities to support subrecipients and patient access outlined in (c) 2- 4. (g) Fifteen percent of funds allocated may be used by Essential Access Health to cover administrative costs related to completing activities consistent with this provision. 25. The Legislature finds that the total funds appropriated in this item exceeds the amount of General Fund revenue appropriated to support the Medi-Cal program prior to the effective date of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 14199.100) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code (Proposition 35). The Legislature further finds that, for purposes of Proposition 35, increases in Medi-Cal base managed care capitation rates reflect an expansion of healthcare benefits, healthcare services, healthcare workforce, and payment rates above and beyond those already in effect or in existence as of January 1, 2024, and are in addition to existing reimbursement rates and any other payments made by the department as of January 1, 2024, and do not supplant amounts that would otherwise be payable by a Medi-Cal managed care plan or the department, as applicable, to a recipient of moneys provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 141900.109) of Chapter 7.5 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 26. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), a one-time $50,000,000 allocation shall be available for the Department of Health Care Services (DHCS) to provide non-competitive grants to county behavioral health departments to support the implementation of Proposition 36 (2024). (b) Grants shall be provided to counties according to an allocation methodology determined by DHCS, in consultation with the Judicial Council. (c) Counties shall spend at least 50 percent of the funds allocated pursuant to this provision to support planning and capacity building activities to expand and accelerate services, including, but not limited to, capital for housing and treatment, including recovery housing; hiring, training, and development of policies and procedures; support for information technology infrastructure costs, including, but not limited to, changes needed to electronic medical record systems; and changes needed for reporting data, and case tracking. No matching funds are required for any portion of a county’s allocation that is expended solely on planning and capacity building activities. (d) Any portion of a county’s allocation expended on behavioral health treatment services shall be matched by a 25 percent match from local funding sources. County behavioral health departments must maximize federal reimbursements for eligible services, in collaboration with the courts and other partners. Funding allocated under this provision may not be used to pay for services that are covered by an individual’s commercial insurance coverage. These provisions are not intended to replace or relieve current county funding obligations required to draw down federal matching funds for Medi-Cal covered services. (e) Funding spent on services pursuant to subprovision (d) may be used to cover costs associated with Proposition 36 (2024) that are not Medi-Cal reimbursable, including workload and behavioral health evaluations related to court proceedings and treatment not covered by Medi-Cal, or private commercial insurance. (f) As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this provision, county behavioral health departments shall provide data and outcomes, including, but not limited to, information on how funds were expended and the number of people served, in a manner determined by DHCS, in consultation with the Judicial Council. DHCS shall coordinate with the Judicial Council to ensure that the data is collected and reported necessary for the Judicial Council to comply with the reporting requirement in Provision 20 of Item 0250-101-0001. (g) Up to 5 percent of this funding may be retained by DHCS for administering this funding. (h) The funding allocated in this provision shall be available for expenditure or encumbrance until June 30, 2028. (i) In providing the funding allocated in this provision, it is the intent of the Legislature to help offset county responsibilities related to the initial implementation of Proposition 36 (2024). (j) For purposes of implementing this section, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. (k) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, and make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, information notices, or similar instructions. 27. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,000,000 is available for encumbrance or expenditure for the State Department of Health Care Services to support the urgent needs and emergent issues of children and youth, including the promotion and enhancement of next generation digital support tools for mental health as a component of the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative, as well as the development of single-session interventions and tools to support children, youth and families affected by wildfires. 28. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,000,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to Equality California. (a) Of the amount allocated in this provision, $1,250,000 shall be available to support the healthcare of transgender individuals and families. (b) Of the amount allocated in this provision, $750,000 shall be available to support health access and education. 29. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $300,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to the El Centro de Amistad for infrastructure. 30. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $5,000,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to the County of Humboldt for support of the Mad River Behavioral Health Triage Center. 31. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $750,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to the County of Humboldt for support of the Sorrel Leaf Healing Center. 32. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,500,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to the County of Sonoma for the Alexander Valley Healthcare Center Project. 33. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,000,000 is provided for one-time direct payment to the City and County of San Francisco for the new oncology clinic and chemotherapy center for Chinese Hospital. SEC. 21. Item 4300-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4300-001-0890—For support of State Department of Developmental Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 3,026,0004,026,000 Schedule: (1) 4149001-Program Administration ........................ 3,026,0004,026,000 Provisions: 1. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer such funds as are necessary between this item and Item 4300-101-0890 in order to effectively administer the Early Intervention Program (Part C of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq.)). SEC. 22. Item 5225-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5225-001-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 7,769,981,0007,882,980,000 Schedule: (1) 4500-Corrections and Rehabilitation Administration ........................ 563,611,000668,391,000 (2) 4505-Peace Officer Selection and Employee Development ........................ 126,857,00095,357,000 (3) 4510-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 74,032,000 (4) 4530-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​General Security ........................ 4,686,548,0004,800,048,000 (5) 4540-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Inmate Support ........................ 1,376,440,0001,324,940,000 (6) 4550-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Institution Administration ........................ 560,973,000560,352,000 (7) 4555-Parole Operations—​Adult Supervision ........................ 350,015,000330,214,000 (8) 4560-Parole Operations—​Adult Community-Based Programs ........................ 98,493,00097,993,000 (9) 4565-Parole Operations—​Adult Administration ........................ 81,796,00080,437,000 (10) 4570-Sex Offender Management Board and SARATSO Review Committee ........................ 953,000 (11) Reimbursements to 4500-Corrections and Rehabilitation Administration ........................ −4,812,000 (12) Reimbursements to 4505-Peace Officer Selection and Employee Development ........................ −150,000 (13) Reimbursements to 4530-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​General Security ........................ −64,998,000 (14) Reimbursements to 4540-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Inmate Support ........................ −58,263,000 (15) Reimbursements to 4550-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Institution Administration ........................ −19,999,000 (16) Reimbursements to 4555-Parole Operations—​Adult Supervision ........................ −515,000 (17) Reimbursements to 4560-Parole Operations—​Adult Community-Based Programs ........................ −500,000 (18) Reimbursements to 4565-Parole Operations—​Adult Administration ........................ −500,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall store all audio and video obtained through the statewide correctional video surveillance program for a period of no less than 90 days from the date recorded. Additionally, the following events shall require the department to preserve the recorded data for a longer period as potential evidence in an investigation, or an administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding: (a) Any use-of-force incident. (b) Riots. (c) Suspected felonious criminal activity. (d) Any incident resulting in serious bodily injury, great bodily injury, or a suspicious death. (e) Sexual assault allegations. (f) Allegations of staff misconduct by an inmate, employee, visitor, or other person. (g) Incidents that may be potentially referred to the district attorney’s office. (h) An employee report to a supervisor of injury. The following events shall require staff to preserve the recorded data for a longer period if filed or reported within 90 days of the event: (1) Inmate claims with the California Victim Compensation Board. (2) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Internal Affairs may request to review audio and video recordings when conducting an inquiry as it relates to a submitted third-level appeal. An audio or video recording that becomes evidence in a Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Internal Affairs investigation shall be stored until resolution of any investigation and written release by the Office of Internal Affairs, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Legal Affairs, the Attorney General, or the Employment Advocacy and Prosecution Team of the Office of Legal Affairs. An audio or video recording that the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation has reason to believe may become evidence in an administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding shall be stored indefinitely unless other direction is given by the Office of Legal Affairs or, in the event of a criminal proceeding, the district attorney’s office. 1.5. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall utilize video obtained through the statewide correctional video surveillance program during the review of staff complaints and other serious appeals and complaints. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedules (4) and (5), $18,233,000 and $1,525,000 is available for the Integrated Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program, respectively. Any unencumbered balances of the amounts identified in this provision shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2026. 3. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall report spending on class action lawsuits against the department to the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office by January 31 of each year. At a minimum, this report shall include spending for each lawsuit in the most recently completed fiscal year on all litigation activities, including, but not limited to, the costs of the department’s legal staff time, payments to outside counsel for legal services, and payments to plaintiffs, monitors, and court experts. 4. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit an updated report to the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by January 10 of each year until 2030, of the status of state-owned deactivated adult and juvenile correctional facility properties for evaluation. The report shall include an inventory of all deactivated facilities, a discussion of any functions the properties are currently serving, and projected timelines for declaring properties as surplus to the Department of General Services. 5. Of the amount specified in Schedule (6) of this item, up to $17,567,000 is specified for the purpose of the Air Cooling Pilot Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (a) On or before January 10, 2026, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit to the budget committees of each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst's Office a report on the following: (1) The department's current capabilities and plans to collect statewide data on temperature in housing units as well as other areas of prisons that may also require cooling, such as kitchens. (2) For the Air Cooling Pilot Program housing units, the design type, existing air cooling infrastructure, if any, and number of days with indoor temperatures exceeding 90 degrees between July 1, 2025, and October 31, 2025. (2.5) The number of days in Stage 1, 2, and 3 heat alerts in the prior calendar year during the reporting period of May 1 through October 31, by institution. (3) A discussion of the steps taken or planned steps, such as conducting additional engineering studies, to identify cooling options for housing units not included in the pilot. (4) A discussion of policies and/or practices adopted and/or under consideration to mitigate the effects of indoor heat in the near term. (b) On or before January 10, 2031, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit to the budget committees of each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office a report on the results of the pilot program and recommended statewide strategy for scaling air cooling in a timely and efficient manner. To the extent the strategy would involve deactivating housing units while air cooling is being installed, the report should discuss how the department would manage the impact to the prison population and employees. In addition, the report should include consideration of options to expedite installation. 6. Schedule (1) of this item reflects an unallocated reduction of $125,000,000 for 2025–26 for the purposes of effectuating planned savings from various operational efficiencies across the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. To implement this plan, upon order of the Department of Finance, up to $125,000,000 may be transferred between schedules in this item and the Department of Finance may order that funds be transferred between this item and schedules within other items of appropriation for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation as follows: Items 5225-001-0001, 5225-002-0001, 5225-008-0001, 5225-009-0001, 5225-012-0001, 5225-014-0001, 5225-016-0001, 5225-025-0001, 5225-093-0001, 5225-094-0001, and 5225-101-0001. The aggregate appropriation adjustments allocated under this provision shall balance to $0. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 30 days prior to implementing any adjustments authorized under this provision. It is the intent of the Legislature that in effectuating these planned savings, no reductions shall be made, to the extent possible, to the level, quantity, or quality of rehabilitative and reentry programming, especially programs provided by community-based non-profit organizations, or of programs related to family connection, including phone calls and the frequency and duration of visitation. The administration shall first consider other reductions that do not otherwise violate a court order or jeopardize the health and safety of the staff, incarcerated persons, or the public. The Integrated Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program is not included in the category of rehabilitative or reentry programming for the purposes of this provision. 7. TheDepartment The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide copies of its regular status updates on implementing the Office of the Inspector General's Natural Disaster Emergency Preparedness and Mitigation Efforts audit to the budget and policy committees of each house, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Legislative Analyst's Office at the same intervals the updates are provided to the Office of the Inspector General. SEC. 23. Item 5225-002-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5225-002-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 4,069,694,0004,062,234,000 Schedule: (1) 4650-Medical Services—​Adult ........................ 2,720,310,0002,738,450,000 (2) 4655-Dental Services—​Adult ........................ 179,314,000177,314,000 (3) 4660-Mental Health Services—​Adult ........................ 729,421,000 (4) 4665-Ancillary Health Care Services—​Adult ........................ 434,150,000415,150,000 (5) 4670-Dental and Mental Health Services Administration—​Adult ........................ 72,605,00068,005,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4650-Medical Services—​Adult ........................ −59,906,000 (7) Reimbursements to 4665-Ancillary Health Care Services—​Adult ........................ −6,200,000 Provisions: 1. On February 14, 2006, the United States District Court in the case of Plata v. Newsom (No. C01-1351-JST) suspended the exercise by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation of all powers related to the administration, control, management, operation, and financing of the California prison medical health care system. The court ordered that all such powers vested in the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation were to be performed by a Receiver appointed by the court commencing April 17, 2006, until further order of the court. The Director of the Division of Correctional Health Care Services of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is to administer this item to the extent directed by the Receiver. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is not required to competitively bid for health services contracts in cases in which contracting experience or history indicates that only one qualified bid will be received. 3. Notwithstanding Section 13324 of the Government Code or Section 32.00 of this act, a state employee shall not be held personally liable for any expenditure or the creation of any indebtedness in excess of the amounts appropriated therefor as a result of complying with the directions of the Receiver or orders of the United States District Court in Plata v. Newsom. 4. The amounts appropriated in Schedules (1) and (4) are available for expenditure by the Receiver appointed by the Plata v. Newsom court to carry out its mission to deliver constitutionally adequate medical care to inmates. 5. The amounts appropriated in Schedules (2), (3), and (5) are available for expenditure by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to provide mental health and dental services only. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, the Receiver, on behalf of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, shall process and pay for all medical claims for medical parolees pursuant to Section 3550 of the Penal Code from funds available in Schedule (1). 7. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedules (1) and (4), $132,298,000 and $68,707,000 are available for the Integrated Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program, respectively. Any unencumbered balances of the amounts identified in this provision shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2026. 8. The amount appropriated in Schedule (4) reflects a reduction of $13,923,000 based on estimated abatement amounts that will be received by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation from the Pharmaceutical Fiscal Intermediary. Notwithstanding any other law, upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount in Schedule (4) may be adjusted to align with actual or estimated abatement amounts that are received or projected to be received from the Pharmaceutical Fiscal Intermediary and to meet cashflow needs resulting from the delay in receipt of abatement amounts. To the extent an adjustment is made pursuant to this provision related to cashflow needs, the Department of Finance may order subsequent adjustments to the amount in Schedule (4) of this item consistent with receipt of abatement amounts. 9. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide biannual reporting to the Legislature on abatements received and adjustments made pursuant to Provision 8 by July 31 and January 31 of each year, beginning July 31, 2025, through January 1, 2028. 10. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall work in collaboration with other state agencies, community-based service providers, and other stakeholders as determined by the department, to develop a report focused on alternatives to incarceration for individuals who are advanced in age, disabled, or have significant medical needs. Alternatives may include identifying community correctional reentry centers, Medi-Cal offset possibilities, and the development of new community-based programs, among other alternatives as determined by the department. The report may also identify potential changes the department has or is considering to existing programs, such as the compassionate release, medical parole, and elderly parole programs, to the extent any changes are considered, and any limitations to changes considered. The alternatives shall address the growing number of incarcerated individuals who are advanced in age, disabled, or have significant medical needs. In evaluating the alternatives, the department shall assess the potential to reduce departmental costs, provide the appropriate treatment settings required, challenges faced, and recommendations for accompanying statutory or policy changes that would facilitate the alternatives explored. The department shall provide the report to the Legislature on or before March 1, 2026. 11. The reports required by Provision 10 of this item shall be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code. 12. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall deposit any fines related to staffing vacancies into the Mental Health Staffing Special Deposit Fund as ordered by the United States District Court for the Eastern District in Coleman v. Newsom. Payment shall be made from the General Fund. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide quarterly reports to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee on any fines paid to the court pursuant to this provision. 13. The amount appropriated in Schedules (1) and (4) incorporates General Fund offsets of $5,000,000 and $6,000,000, respectively, based on anticipated federal reimbursements for the California Advancing and Innovating Medi-Cal Justice Involved Initiative (CalAIM). Notwithstanding any other law, upon order of the Department of Finance, the amounts available in Schedules (1) and (4) of this item may be adjusted to align with actual or estimated reimbursement amounts under CalAIM. SEC. 24. Item 5225-492 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5225-492—Reappropriation, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $200,000 in Item 5225-018-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (2) Up to $5,000,000 in Item 5225-008-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). 0917—Inmate Welfare Fund (1) Up to $5,000,000 in Item 5225-001-0917, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). SEC. 25. Item 5225-493 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5225-493—Reappropriation, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations appropriations, unless otherwise specified below, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $5,000,000 in Item 5225-008-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (1) $22,315,000 in Item 5225-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) to be transferred to Item 5225-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (2) $40,000,000 in Item 5225-002-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) to be transferred to Item 5225-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (3) $4,000,000 in Item 5225-008-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) to be transferred to Item 5225-001-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). (4) $33,000,000 in Item 5225-002-0001 Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) to be transferred to Item 5225-002-0001, Budget Act of 2025 (Chs. 4 and 5, Stats. 2025). SEC. 26. Item 5225-494 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is repealed. 5225-494—Reappropriation, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026:0917—Inmate Welfare Fund(1)Up to $5,000,000 in Item 5225-001-0917, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). SEC. 27. Item 5225-496 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 5225-496—Reversion, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. As of June 30, 2026, the balances specified below, of the appropriations provided in the following citations, shall revert to the fund balances of the funds from which the appropriations were made: 0682—Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account, Prison Industries Revolving Fund (1) Up to $114,148,000 shall revert from the Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account, Prison Industries Revolving Fund to the General Fund. SEC. 28. Item 6100-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-001-0001—For support of State Department of Education ........................ 118,460,000 Schedule: (1) 5205010-Curriculum Services ........................ 85,130,000 (1.5) 5210048-After School Programs ........................ 1,583,000 (2) 5210066-Special Program Support ........................ 42,442,000 (3) 9900100-Administration ........................ 59,601,000 (4) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −59,601,000 (5) Reimbursements to 5205010-Curriculum Services ........................ −9,729,000 (6) Reimbursements to 5210066-Special Program Support ........................ −966,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 33190 of the Education Code or any other law, the State Department of Education shall not expend funds to prepare a statewide summary of pupil performance on school district proficiency assessments or a compilation of information on private schools with five or fewer pupils. 2. Funds appropriated in this item may be expended or encumbered to make one or more payments under a personal services contract of a visiting educator pursuant to Section 19050.8 of the Government Code, a long-term special consultant services contract, or an employment contract between an entity that is not a state agency and a person who is under the direct or daily supervision of a state agency, only if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The person providing service under the contract provides full financial disclosure to the Fair Political Practices Commission in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission. (b) The service provided under the contract does not result in the displacement of any represented civil service employee. (c) The rate of compensation for salary and health benefits for the person providing service under the contract does not exceed by more than 10 percent the current rate of compensation for salary and health benefits determined by the Department of Human Resources for civil service personnel in a comparable position. The payment of any other compensation or any reimbursement for travel or per diem expenses shall be in accordance with the State Administrative Manual and the rules and regulations of the California Victim Compensation Board. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall not be expended for the development or dissemination of program advisories, including, but not limited to, program advisories on the subject areas of reading, writing, and mathematics, unless explicitly authorized by the State Board of Education. 4. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $206,000 shall be available as matching funds for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to provide coordinated services to disabled pupils. 5. By October 31 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance a file of all charter school average daily attendance (ADA) and state and local revenue associated with charter school general purpose entitlements as part of the P2 Local Control Funding Formula File. By March 1 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance a file of all charter school ADA and state and local revenue associated with charter school general purpose entitlements as part of the P1 Local Control Funding Formula File. It is the expectation that such reports will be provided annually. 6. On or before April 15 of each year, the State Department of Education shall provide to the Department of Finance an electronic file that includes complete district- and county-level state appropriations limit information reported to the State Department of Education. The State Department of Education shall make every effort to ensure that all districts have submitted the necessary information requested on the relevant reporting forms. 7. The State Department of Education shall make information available to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the budget committees of each house of the Legislature by October 31, March 31, and May 31 of each year regarding the amount of Proposition 98 savings estimated to be available for reversion by June 30 of that year. 8. Reimbursement expenditures pursuant to this item resulting from the imposition by the State Department of Education of a commercial copyright fee shall not be expended sooner than 30 days after the State Department of Education submits to the Department of Finance a legal opinion affirming the authority to impose such fees and the arguments supporting that position against any objections or legal challenges to the fee filed with the State Department of Education. Any funds received pursuant to imposition of a commercial copyright fee may only be expended as necessary for outside counsel contingent on a certification of the Superintendent of Public Instruction that sufficient expertise is not available within departmental legal staff. The State Department of Education shall not expend greater than $300,000 for such purposes without first notifying the Department of Finance of the necessity therefor, and upon receiving approval in writing. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $1,011,000 is available for dispute resolution services, including mediation and fair hearing services, provided through contract for special education programs. 10. Of the reimbursement funds appropriated in this item, at least $612,000 is provided to the State Department of Education for the oversight of State Board of Education-authorized charter schools. The Department of Finance may administratively establish up to 2.0 positions for this purpose as workload materializes. 11. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $109,000 shall be for 1.0 position within the State Department of Education to support activities associated with the Clean Energy Job Creation Fund. 12. Of the amount appropriated in this item, at least $852,000 and 6.0 positions are provided to support the Local Control Funding Formula administration pursuant to Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2013. These funds and positions shall be used by the State Department of Education to support the apportionment of, and fiscal oversight of, funding pursuant to the Local Control Funding Formula. 13. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $115,000 and 1.0 position shall be available for the State Department of Education to support activities associated with charter school appeals as required under subdivision (k) of Section 47605 of the Education Code. 14. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $1,140,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of the Local Control Funding Formula accountability system pursuant to Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2013. 15. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $120,000 and 1.0 permanent position are provided to support implementation of the Local Control Funding Formula, such as providing unduplicated pupil counts, matching foster data received from the State Department of Social Services, and meeting foster youth reporting requirements. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $271,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to continue the development and maintenance of the state and federal accountability systems. 17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $129,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position for workload associated with school district reorganizations. 18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $108,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position to assist local educational agencies applying for a universal meal service program, pursuant to Chapter 724 of the Statutes of 2017. 19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $128,000 is provided to support 1.0 existing position to complete additional education equity compliance reviews, pursuant to Chapter 493 of the Statutes of 2017. 20. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $252,000 shall be used to support the development and maintenance of a computer-based English Language Proficiency Assessment for California (ELPAC) and a computer-based alternative ELPAC for students with disabilities. 21. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $257,000 is provided to support 2.0 existing positions for the coordination of a centralized Uniform Complaint Procedures process and database to improve the administration and resolution of Uniform Complaint Procedures complaints and appeals received by the State Department of Education; to standardize Uniform Complaint Procedures policies, procedures, and templates departmentwide; and to provide a report by January 31 of each year with a summary of the number of days for completion of appeals by complaint type and program area, including the rationale for complaints that exceeded 60 days. 23. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $600,000 is provided to support 2.0 existing positions and workload related to school-based comprehensive sexual health education. 24. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $105,000 and 1.0 position are to support increases in emergency average daily attendance waiver requests. 25. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $452,000 is provided for 3.0 positions to support compliance workload within the State Department of Education’s Special Education Division. 26. Of the funds appropriated in this item, at least $275,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program and the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program. Availability of these funds is contingent upon the State Department of Education fully supporting no fewer than 6.0 full-time regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education in the Agricultural Education Unit of the Career and College Transition Division using federal Perkins V Act funding. If the State Department of Education is unable to support at least 6.0 full-time regional program consultants in agricultural career technical education with federal Perkins V Act funding, $142,000 and 1.0 position provided in this item to support the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program and the K–12 component of the Strong Workforce Program shall be redirected for that purpose. As a condition of receiving this funding, the State Department of Education shall make information available to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the budget committees of each house of the Legislature by October 31 of each fiscal year regarding the split of the federal Perkins V Act funding between the State Department of Education and the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges. This information shall include, but is not limited to, the maximum set-asides allowable for state administration and state leadership activities, the minimum amount required for local program distribution, as well as a breakdown of how the State Department of Education is utilizing the funds in each category. 27. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $303,000 is provided to support 2.0 positions for the joint interagency resolution team and foster youth coordinated services pursuant to Chapter 815 of the Statutes of 2018. 28. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $77,000 is provided to support 0.5 existing position to update existing, and develop new, resources and strategies, and in-service teacher training to support lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, and questioning students, pursuant to Chapter 775 of the Statutes of 2019. 29. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $77,000 is provided to support 1.0 position to provide appropriate language access in American Sign Language. 30. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $696,000 and 3.0 positions are available for the department to collect data to track the implementation of the changes for charter school petitions and renewals, pursuant to Chapter 486 of the Statutes of 2019. 31. Of the amount provided in this item, $192,000 reimbursements are provided on an ongoing basis to support the administration of the California High School Proficiency Examination. 32. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $264,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to establish a state education disaster team to support activities related to disaster planning, preparedness, and response for schools as part of California’s Disaster Preparedness, Response, and Recovery efforts. 33. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $336,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support new ongoing workload for the School Fiscal Services Division related to deferrals and average daily attendance changes pursuant to Chapter 24 of the Statutes of 2020. 34. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $136,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support workload related to creating a school emergency reporting system. 35. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $12,598,000 is provided to support 52.8 existing positions in the Nutrition Services Division, and 30.0 positions in the Early Education Division to support remaining early learning workload after the transition of childcare programs to the State Department of Social Services. 36. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $376,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support increased workload in the accounting office. 38. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $3,403,000 is provided to support existing authorized administrative positions. 39. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,960,000 is provided to support existing authorized administrative positions. 40. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $700,000 is provided to support 5.0 new positions and 1.0 existing position for the State Department of Education to establish the Office of School-Based Health. 41. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $250,000 and 1.0 permanent position are provided to establish the California Computer Science Coordinator. The coordinator shall provide statewide coordination in implementing the computer science content standards developed pursuant to Section 60605.4 of the Education Code and lead the implementation of the computer science strategic implementation plan adopted by the State Board of Education. 42. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $425,000 and 2.5 positions are available to support workload associated with expanded Transitional Kindergarten programs. 43. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $437,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support early learning workload in the Child Development and Nutrition Fiscal Services Division. 44. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,670,000 and 3.0 positions are available to support early learning workload in the Early Education Division. 45. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,583,000 and 11.7 positions are provided to support early learning workload. 46. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $143,000 and 1.0 position are available for a Medi-Cal billing coordinator to serve as a liaison with the State Department of Health Care Services, stakeholders, and others with respect to Medi-Cal billing options, the school-based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities Program, and medically necessary federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment Benefits. 47. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $467,000 and 4.0 positions are provided for the School Fiscal Services Division to support workload related to state apportionment calculations, review of average daily attendance waivers, technical assistance, and implementation of grant programs. 48. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,653,000 and 14.0 positions are provided for the Expanded Learning Division to provide students in classroom-based instructional programs with access to comprehensive after school and intersessional expanded learning opportunities. 49. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $130,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support implementation of the Standardized Account Code Structure web-based application. 50. Of the amount appropriated in this item, at least $286,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support professional development programs, including, but not limited to, the National Board Certification Incentive Grant, the Educator Effectiveness Block Grant, Professional Development on Social Emotional Learning and Trauma Informed Practices, Professional Development for Reading Instruction and Intervention, Training for Youth Mental and Behavioral Health, and other teacher professional development. 51. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $286,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of the universal school meals program. 52. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $561,000 and 4.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for work related to the Expanded Learning and Transitional Kindergarten Programs. 53. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $425,000 and 3.0 positions are provided for additional new formula-driven program implementation. 54. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $155,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the Technology Services Division for Transitional Kindergarten average daily attendance data collection. 55. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $742,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to support the Community Schools Partnership Grant Program. 56. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $143,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the California Healthy Kids Survey and social-emotional learning professional development. 57. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $143,000 and 1.0 position are provided for the Early Education Division to address increased workload in the California State Preschool Program. 58. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $130,000 and 1.0 position are provided for the Fiscal and Administrative Services Division to address increased workload in the California State Preschool Program. 61. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $201,000 is provided for 2.0 positions in the Office of School Transportation. 62. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the Supporting Inclusive Practices Grant. 63. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $690,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to improve transitions from Part C Early Intervention Services to Part B Special Education Services. 64. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $266,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support increased departmental information technology needs and workload. 65. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,681,000 is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year to continue supporting departmental information security infrastructure. Of this amount, $2,632,000 and 6.0 positions are provided on an ongoing basis to support replacement of aging hardware, maintaining already implemented cybersecurity technical capabilities, and implementing the remaining cybersecurity technical capabilities to achieve full compliance with the Department of Technology’s Cal-Secure Information Security Roadmap. 66. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,702,000 and 9.0 positions are provided to support implementation and ongoing workload for the Cradle-to-Career Data System. 69. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $383,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to the Budget Management Office to effectively support new and expanded programs and address increased workload due to Fi$Cal implementation. 70. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $159,000 and 1.0 position are provided to coordinate improved access to early intervention services for children prior to entering kindergarten. 71. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $458,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support the implementation of Chapter 498 of the Statutes of 2021 (AB 1363). 72. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $633,000 and 4.0 positions are provided for the programmatic monitoring of the California State Preschool Program. 73. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $119,000 and 1.0 position are appropriated for the fiscal monitoring of the California State Preschool Program. 74. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $436,000 and 2.5 positions are provided to support the implementation of Universal Transitional Kindergarten. 75. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $90,000 and 0.5 position are provided to support fiscal compliance monitoring reviews of program funds. 76. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $122,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support fund reconciliation workload. 77. Of the funds appropriated in this item, 1.0 position is provided to support an increase in legal workload related to new and expanded programs including Universal Transitional Kindergarten and the California State Preschool Program. 78. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $167,000 is provided for Zoom licenses to host webinars and online meetings. 81. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $350,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to support increased workload related to operating the information technology systems used by the State Department of Education’s early education programs. 82. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $276,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to incorporate early identification for learning disabilities into the State Department of Education’s preschool assessment tools, and to provide training for educators on effective use of those tools. 83. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $612,000 and 4.0 positions are provided to support increased workload related to administering the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program. 84. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $769,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to support increased workload related to revising California State Preschool Program policies. 85. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $356,000 and 2.5 positions are provided to support workload associated with expanded Transitional Kindergarten programs. 87. Of the amount provided in this item, $75,000 reimbursements is provided through the 2026–27 fiscal year for state operations support of Fresno Unified School District in facilitation of grant funds from the Wallace Foundation. 88. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the development and expansion of California Science Test (CAST) and the California Alternate Assessment (CAA) for Science within the Assessment Development and Administration Division. 89. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $161,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support the development and expansion of English Language Proficiency Assessments for California (ELPAC) and the California Spanish Assessment (CSA) within the Assessment Development and Administration Division. 90. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $140,000 is provided through June 30, 2027, to provide technical assistance and support to local educational agencies in hiring and training literacy coaches and reading specialists through the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program, pursuant to Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2022. 92. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,069,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for workload related to the Local Control Funding Formula declining enrollment protection proposal, AB 602 Special Education formula changes, and other fiscal-related workload for new programs. 93. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $250,000 is available to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for fiscal oversight of county offices of education and the seven school districts in the state that share the same governing board as their county office of education for the services of a fiscal expert or adviser pursuant to Section 1630 of the Education Code or to compensate members of a Budget Review Committee established pursuant to Education Code Sections 1623 or 42127.1. The State Department of Education shall notify and receive approval from the Director of Finance in advance of retaining the services of a fiscal expert or fiscal adviser. 94. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $150,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the School Health and Safety Office to support LGBTQ+ initiatives and best practices. 95. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $160,000 is provided for Education Commission of the States membership dues. 96. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,232,000 and 8.0 positions are provided to the Analysis, Measurement, and Accountability Reporting Division to establish a Data Science Office for the purposes of collecting new one-time or short-term data, providing contextual analysis to measure priority initiatives and programs, and providing timely data and information directly to policymakers including the State Board of Education and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days. 97. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,276,000 is available in fiscal years 2024–25 and 2025–26, for the State Department of Education to contract with a vendor to provide direct deposit to State Preschool contractors, beginning November 1, 2023. Contracts awarded pursuant to this provision shall allow for advance payment, and the department is hereby authorized to provide advance payment in order to implement direct deposit to State Preschool contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of this provision, the department is exempt from the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code. Funds provided pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance through June 30, 2026. 101. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $152,000 and 1.0 position are provided to support workload associated with the Quality Rating and Improvement System (QRIS) Block Grant. 102. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $645,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to support workload related to implementing Classroom Assessments Scoring System (CLASS) for all California State Preschool Program (CSPP) providers. 103. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $740,000 and 5.0 positions are provided to support workload associated with implementing the requirements of Chapter 915 of the Statutes of 2022 which revised provisions related to the suspension and expulsion of children from the CSPP and increased the requirements for early childhood mental health consultation services. 104. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,932,000 and 9.0 positions are provided to support workload associated with collecting student and teacher level data from California State Preschool Programs (CSPPs) that are operated by a local educational agency pursuant to Chapter 901 of the Statutes of 2022. 105. Of the funds provided in Schedule (2), $449,000 is provided in the 2024–25 fiscal year and 3.0 positions, and $164,000 ongoing to support the development of the Whole Child Equity Framework and the Whole Child Community Equity Screening Tool, pursuant to Chapter 699 of the Statutes of 2022. 106. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $138,000 and 1.0 position are provided to the Office of School Transportation for the data processing workload associated with the Home-to-School Transportation program. 107. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $164,000 General Fund and 1.0 position are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division for the additional data processing workload associated with the Home-to-School Transportation program. 108. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,316,000 and 7.0 positions are provided to support improved Teacher Assignment Monitoring Outcomes data collection and reporting through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System and partnership with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing and the California Statewide Assignment Accountability System. 109. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $300,000 and 2.0 positions are provided to the Analysis, Measurement and Accountability Reporting Division for workload related to the California School Dashboard state indicator data and the timelines associated with the collection of data through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System. 110. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $473,000 and 3.0 positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services and Curriculum Frameworks and Instruction Resources Divisions, for workload related to the implementation of Proposition 28, and schoolsite level data collection workload related to the equity multiplier allocation. 111. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $380,000 is available on an ongoing basis for warranty support for network equipment and to upgrade server software at the State Special Schools and Diagnostic Centers. 113. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (5), $152,000 is provided to support the State Department of Education’s Broadband Coordinator position. 114. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $321,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support new ongoing workload associated with the implementation of Chapter 342 of the Statutes of 2023. 115. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $392,000 and 2.0 positions are available to support new ongoing workload associated with the implementation of Chapter 229 of the Statutes of 2023. 116. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $102,000 is available for the 2025–26 fiscal year to support 1.0 existing position to convene the Classified Employee Staffing Ratio Workgroup, pursuant to Chapter 364 of the Statutes of 2023. 117. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), 1.0 position, and $182,000 ongoing are provided to support new ongoing workload associated with the implementation of Chapter 435 of the Statutes of 2023. 118. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $57,000 is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year on a one-time basis to support temporary workload associated with developing evidence-based best practices for extreme weather guidance and safety on school campuses pursuant to Chapter 463 of the Statutes of 2024. 119. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $77,000 is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year on a one-time basis to support temporary workload associated with updating guidelines, trainings and other resources for School Food Authorities as it relates to newly prohibited substances and food dye information pursuant to Chapter 914 of the Statutes of 2024. 120. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $328,000 is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year, of which $164,000 is one-time to support the temporary workload with developing the statewide English Learner Roadmap Policy and $164,000 and 1.0 position is ongoing to support the statewide implementation of the English Learner Roadmap Policy pursuant to Chapter 946 of the Statutes of 2024. 121. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,000,000 is provided on a one-time basis for attorney fees associated with the Cayla J. v. State of California settlement. 122. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $730,000 is provided on a one-time basis in the 2025–26 fiscal year to support acquisition of a vendor contract to design and develop a replacement Principal Apportionment Application, and $541,000 and 3.0 permanent positions are provided to the School Fiscal Services Division in the 2025–26 fiscal year, of which $538,000 is ongoing to facilitate the migration to the new application, ongoing maintenance, operation, and programming updates. The funds appropriated for the 2025–26 fiscal year shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2029. 123. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $1,437,000 and 9.0 positions are available to support the development of an updated Form J-90 and associated data collection, pursuant to Chapter 345 of the Statutes of 2024, in the 2025–26 fiscal year. $1,408,000 and 9.0 positions shall be available for this purpose in the 2026–27 fiscal year, and $1,239,000 and 8.0 positions shall be available for this purpose in the 2027–28 fiscal year, and ongoing. 124. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $141,000 and 1.0 position are available to support ongoing workload associated with the District of Choice program. 125. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $150,000 in reimbursements is provided on a one-time basis to fund an independent cybersecurity assessment at the state special schools and diagnostic centers. 126. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $500,000 in reimbursement authority is provided on a one-time basis for the 2025–26 fiscal year to support monitoring of nonpublic agencies. 127. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $385,000 is available to support the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer Program. 128. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $437,000 in reimbursements is provided in the 2025–26 fiscal year to expend the fees collected from publishers for instructional materials adoptions. 129. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,092,000 and 8.0 positions are available to support the California State Preschool Program in the 2025–26 fiscal year and ongoing. 130. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $380,000 in reimbursement authority is provided to support the implementation of the requirements of Section 33319.6 of the Education Code. SEC. 29. Item 6100-194-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-194-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education, for allocation by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to school districts, county offices of education, and other agencies for the California State Preschool Program and other preschool programs included in this item, in lieu of the amount that otherwise would be appropriated pursuant to any other statute ........................ 1,022,262,000 Schedule: (1) 5210027-State Preschool Non-Local Educational Agencies ........................ 1,022,262,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, families shall be disenrolled from subsidized childcare services consistent with the priorities for services specified in Sections 8210 and 8211 of the Education Code. Families shall be disenrolled in the following order: (a) families with the highest income below 85 percent of the State Median Income (SMI) adjusted for family size, (b) of families with the same income level, those that have been receiving childcare services for the longest period of time, (c) of families with the same income level, those that have a child with exceptional needs, and (d) families with children who are receiving child protective services or are at risk of being neglected or abused, regardless of family income. 2. Funds in Schedule (1) shall be allocated to both the part-day and full-day California State Preschool Program for nonlocal educational agencies. 3. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize a cash loan from the General Fund for cashflow purposes, in an amount not to exceed $20,000,000, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in the receipt of reimbursements from the California State Preschool Program or the general childcare program funds. (b) The loan is for a short-term need and shall be repaid within 90 days of the loan’s origination date. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to Section 16314 of the Government Code. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $312,000 is available for funding a tool to strengthen teacher-child interactions and support quality improvement. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $14,041,000 is available for the family fee policy to reduce childcare fees to 1 percent of monthly income for families with adjusted monthly income at or above 75 percent of the state median family income pursuant to Section 8252 of the Education Code. 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $35,135,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to augment their contracts due to projected increases in the number of three-year-old children served. 8. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $10,172,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors as an increase to their cost of care reimbursement rates. 9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,730,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to assist local contractors with the implementation of Prospective Pay. Expenditures for this purpose shall be exempt from the administrative costs limit set forth in Section 8258 of the Education Code. 10. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $336,000 is available on a one-time basis for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to assist local contractors with automation related to Prospective Pay. Expenditures for this purpose shall be exempt from the administrative costs limit set forth in Section 8258 of the Education Code. 11.9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $15,568,000 is available on a one-time basis, to provide per-child stabilization payments to support California State Preschool providers. SEC. 30. Item 6100-196-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-196-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), for allocation by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to school districts, county offices of education, and other agencies for the purposes of California state preschool programs pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8207) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code funded in this item, in lieu of the amount that otherwise would be appropriated pursuant to any other statute and the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 8337) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code ........................ 1,835,000,000 Schedule: (1) 5210020-State Preschool—​Local Educational Agencies ........................ 1,785,000,000 (2) 5210010-Child Development, Quality Rating Improvement System Grants ........................ 50,000,000 Provisions: 1. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $5,000,000 is available for the family literacy supplemental grant provided to California state preschool programs pursuant to Section 8221 of the Education Code. 3. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) is available for Quality Rating and Improvement System grants provided to California state preschool programs pursuant to Section 8203.1 of the Education Code. 4. Funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be allocated to both the part-day and full-day California State Preschool Program for local educational agencies. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $763,000 is available for funding a tool to strengthen teacher-child interactions and support quality improvement. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $15,833,000 is available for the family fee policy to reduce childcare fees to 1 percent of monthly income for families with adjusted monthly income at or above 75 percent of the state median family income pursuant to Section 8252 of the Education Code. 7. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $63,475,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to augment their contracts due to projected increases in the number of three-year-old children served. 8. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $19,296,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors as an increase to their cost of care reimbursement rates. 9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $5,720,000 is available for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to assist local contractors with the implementation of Prospective Pay. Expenditures for this purpose shall be exempt from the administrative costs limit set forth in Section 8258 of the Education Code. 10. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $704,000 is available on a one-time basis for the State Department of Education to issue to California State Preschool Program contractors to assist local contractors with automation related to Prospective Pay. Expenditures for this purpose shall be exempt from the administrative costs limit set forth in Section 8258 of the Education Code. 11.9. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $37,014,000 is available on a one-time basis, to provide per-child stabilization payments to support California State Preschool providers. SEC. 31. Section 11.62 is added to the Budget Act of 2025, to read: SEC. 11.62. (a) The Director of Finance may authorize amounts of any state department or agency appropriation from any available source of funding, including, but not limited to, the General Fund, to the Office of Emergency Services to provide funding to be disbursed to Los Angeles County or cities within the county for unmet response and recovery needs resulting from damage caused by the Eaton Fire and Palisades Fire in Los Angeles County in January 2025. (b) Amounts authorized pursuant to this section shall be within the cumulative total of $2,500,000,000 authorized in Sections 90.00 and 90.01 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (c) Funding provided pursuant to this section shall not duplicate or replace benefits available or received through other existing assistance programs. (d) Amounts authorized pursuant to this section shall not be made sooner than three days following the transmittal of a notification of the approval to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or an earlier date as determined by the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, except that, for the first $1,000,000,000 of authority pursuant to subdivision (b), the authorizations may be implemented in full immediately with no delay upon such a notification to the chairperson. (e) This section does not change, alter, limit, or constrain the emergency powers of the Governor and the executive branch in state law, including, but not limited to, the Governor’s fiscal authority related to emergencies. (f) Funds authorized pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure consistent with the existing encumbrance deadlines for the items of appropriation that are augmented or an alternate date as determined by the Director of Finance. The Department of Finance may create new items as necessary to facilitate the expenditure of funds augmented pursuant to this section. (g) Requests for funding pursuant to this section may be eligible if received by the Office of Emergency Services on or before June 30, 2026. (h) No later than September 30, 2026, the Department of Finance shall post on its internet website a final Los Angeles Wildfire Response and Recovery Expenditure Report with amounts and uses of funding spent pursuant to this section. SEC. 32. Section 35.50 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 35.50. (a) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 10 of, and subdivision (g) of Section 12 of, Article IV of the California Constitution, “General Fund revenues” means the total resources available to the General Fund for a fiscal year before any transfer to or withdrawal from the Budget Stabilization Account. (b) For purposes of subdivision (g) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, the estimate of General Fund revenues for the 2025–26 fiscal year pursuant to this act, as passed by the Legislature, is $244,822,000,000. (c) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, “General Fund revenues” shall be defined as revenues and transfers before any transfer to or withdrawal from the Budget Stabilization Account. (d) Pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the following estimates are provided: (1) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the sum equal to 1.5 percent of General Fund revenues for the 2025–26 fiscal year is $3,118,000,000. (2) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, capital gains revenues that exceed 8 percent of General Fund proceeds of taxes for the 2025–26 fiscal year is $0. (3) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amount for debt payments in the 2025–26 fiscal year is $1,559,000,000. (4) (A) For purposes of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amount of transfer to the Budget Stabilization Account in the 2025–26 fiscal year is $1,559,000,000. (B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 22 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the transfer to the Budget Stabilization Account for the 2025–26 fiscal year in the amount of $1,559,000,000 is suspended. (C) For purposes of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the first true up of the transfer to the Budget Stabilization Account for the 2025–26 fiscal year is $5,393,000,000. (D) Notwithstanding subparagraph (C), pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 22 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the first true up transfer to the Budget Stabilization Account for the 2025–26 fiscal year in the amount of $5,393,000,000 is suspended. (5) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the updated estimate of capital gains revenues that exceeds 8 percent of General Fund proceeds of taxes for the 2024–25 fiscal year is $478,000,000. (6) For purposes of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the first true up of the transfer to the Budget Stabilization Account for the 2024–25 fiscal year is $23,000,000. (7) For purposes of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the updated capital gains revenues that exceed 8 percent of General Fund proceeds of taxes for the 2023–24 fiscal year is $0. (8) For purposes of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 20 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the second true up of the transfer to the Budget Stabilization Account for the 2023–24 fiscal year is $635,000,000. (e) Pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 22 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, $7,100,000,000 is hereby transferred from the Budget Stabilization Account to the General Fund for the 2025–26 fiscal year effective July 1, 2025. SEC. 33. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2025 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 101). (b) Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 102). (c) Chapter 77 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 104). (d) Chapter 104 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 105). (e) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2026 (Senate Bill No. 106). (f) Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2026 (Assembly Bill No. 107). (g) Chapter 8 of the Statutes of 2026 (Assembly Bill No. 108). SEC. 34. Section 99.50 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: INDEX FOR CONTROL SECTIONS SEC. 99.50. The following is an index to the general sections of this act. These sections serve to define terms and identify restrictions concerning the appropriations contained in this act. 1.00 Budget Act Citation 1.50 Intent and Format 1.51 Citations to Prior Budget Acts 1.80 Availability of Appropriations 2.00 Items of Appropriation 3.00 Defines Purposes of Appropriations 3.10 Subschedule Transfers for Capital Projects 3.50 Benefit Charges Against Salaries and Wages 3.60 Contribution to Public Employees’ Retirement Benefits 3.61 Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits 3.90 Reduction for Employee Compensation 4.05 Budget Adjustment Authority 4.11 Position Vacancy Report 4.12 Vacant Position Elimination 4.13 AB 85 Repayments to Counties 4.20 Contribution to Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve  Fund 4.30 Lease-Revenue Payment Adjustments 4.72 Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure 4.75 Statewide Surcharge 4.80 State Public Works Board Interim Financing 4.90 Architectural Revolving Fund Transfer 4.95 Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account Transfer 5.25 Attorney’s Fees 6.00 Project Alterations Limits 8.00 Antiterrorism Federal Reimbursements 8.50 Federal Funds Receipts 8.51 Federal Funds Accounts 8.52 Federal Reimbursements 8.53 Notice of Federal Audits 8.54 Enforce Recovery of Federal Funds for Statewide Indirect  Costs 8.75 Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act 9.30 Federal Levy of State Funds 9.50 Minor Capital Outlay Projects 11.00 Information Technology Reporting Requirements 11.10 Reporting of Statewide Software License Agreements 11.11 Privacy of Information in Pay Stubs 11.25 Artificial Intelligence Projects in State Departments 11.62 Funding for Fire Response and Recovery 11.96 Coronavirus Fiscal Relief 11.97 State Appropriation Limit Excludable Federal Fund  Appropriations for Capital Outlay 12.00 State Appropriations Limit (SAL) 12.30 Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties 12.32 Proposition 98-Funding Guarantee 12.35 Financial Aid Policy Change Requirements 12.45 June to July Payroll Deferral 13.00 Legislative Counsel Bureau 13.30 Emergency Loans for Local Entities 13.40 Budgetary Loan Borrowing from Special Funds 14.00 Special Fund Loans Between Boards of the Department of  Consumer Affairs 15.01 Proposition 4 Appropriations 15.14 Allocation of Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund 15.25 Data Center Rate Adjustment 15.45 Trial Court Funding Offsets 19.56 Appropriations for Legislative Priorities 19.57 Encumbrance Deadline Extension Authority 20.00 Reappropriations and Reversions 24.00 State School Fund Allocations 24.03 Reading Control 24.30 Transfer School Building Rental Income to the General  Fund 24.60 Report of Lottery Funds Received 24.70 Local Educational Agency Fiscal Accountability 25.40 Contracted Fiscal Services Costs 25.50 SCO Apportionment Payment System Assessments 26.00 Intraschedule Transfers 28.00 Program Change Notification 28.30 Federal Funds Realignment 28.31 Short-Term Cash Loans Due to Delay in Federal Funds 28.50 Agency Reimbursement Payments 29.00 Position Estimates of Governor’s Budget, May Revision,  and Final Change Book 30.00 Continuous Appropriations 31.00 Budget Act Administrative Procedures for Salaries  and Wages 32.00 Prohibits Excess Expenditures 33.00 Item Veto Severability 34.00 Constitutional Severability 35.21 Application of Net Final Payment Accrual Methodology 35.35 FI$Cal—​Short-Term Cash Loans 35.50 Estimated General Fund Revenues and Various Estimates  Related to the Budget Stabilization Account 38.00 Provides That This Bill Is a Budget Bill 39.00 Identification of Bills Related to the Budget Bill 39.10 List of Budget Act Statutes 90.00 Los Angeles County Response and Recovery Costs 91.00 Loans for Specific Local Governments 92.00 Augmentations for Particular Bills 99.00 Alphabetical Organization Index 99.50 Numerical Control Section Index SEC. 35. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately. SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact statutory changes relating to the Budget Act of 2025.